That's where Illuminated Manuscripts shines.
She then lit some scented tea-lights and placed them around the bath, which created a warm, soft glow; she knew this would also help to relax his mind and body. Finally, she put on the CD she had compiled earlier, and with the soft music playing and the bath ready, she called Charles in. Charles had finished his meal and fallen asleep on the sofa.
While we were waiting for him to finish in the sterilization room—which I thought was a comforting sign—we wandered around to look at the photographed work on the walls. It all looked good, especially a selection of portraits in a single frame.
While we were waiting, the doctor came out into the hallway and said, “the goal today is to not have Rebecca leaving the clinic looking like she’s been watching ‘The Joy Luck Club’”! After Becky threw back some, “whatever’s”, we went into the room. Last time, I tried to distract Becky by playing Angry Birds, which worked for two and a half of the four vials of Botox. This time I was armed with a new weapon, Kung Fu Scrat.
3. Only parents can send people to the cry station. We pay the bills, therefore, we are the only ones qualified to make these decisions. It’s not okay to send your siblings to the cry station, just because you think it’s an appropriate time.
So while all of the male characters (and my gosh, there was practically a harem of hot male characters getting all sexy and gorgeous with this whole war-torn-brothers-in-arms thing), I was stuck in Alera's useless head ineptly heating up porridge and feeling empowered because she hacked off her hair. She also sleeps a lot.
And see the peek at our renovation?
So Victoria took to the throne and the care of the Prime Minister, Lord Melbourne (Paul Bettany). He was from the school of micro-manangement. So he spent as much as four or five hours a day tutoring Victoria on the how-to’s of being the Queen. Since they were spending so much time together, and because Lord Melbourne was a smooth one with the ladies, everyone assumed that his Lordship, would eventually become Victoria’s husband despite being 40 years her senior.
If true, that’s good news.
NOTE: This step May require some practice, because the folds should be straight and equal to each other. Try out different ways of folding until you find what works for you.
The basic gist of this month's e-mail was that he did not know when he would be able to rent the apartment to us, as he might have to stay longer, so don't get too excited about it, he would let us know if things changed and if the apartment became available. There was some berating of the price he rented to us, and how it was below the market value, etc. and that if we wanted to find someplace else he would recommend us to someone that he knows who rents rooms....
* The views expressed here are the personal opinion of the columnist.
I'd write more, but I'm off to the butcher.
Ben: Principles by Ben de Lisi of course as the range is elegant and classic whilst being designed for the modern woman. I think highstreet brands should focus on key pieces with a twist as opposed to following trends. Cos and Banana Republic do this so well and I don't even consider them as highstreet brands as such.
And I went about my work, which at the time was giving baths to squirmy little puppies.
As a way to show some love to my (50!) followers, I’m giving away a $50 gift card to everyone’s favorite go-to store: Target! My current 50 followers are automatically entered to win. That’s right, you don’t have to do a thing, just make sure I have your email address so that I can email you if you win.
Abu Marzook spoke with the Forward during two days of sit-down interviews in Cairo, where he now lives. According to the Forward, this was the first-ever interview between a top Hamas official and a Jewish publication….READ MORE
Isn't she the cutest
We've gotten lots of outdoorsy, backyard stuff done. Grass got cut, new picnic table got a pretty coating of stain, tile table top removed & wood trim stained, more potatoes planted, flower seeds planted, lots of plant watering, taking care of chickens & bunny, cuddling new puppies, taking care of Licorice (she goes back on Monday to have her stitches taken out), church Bible study, canned 30 quarts of sweet potatoes, and started dehydrating onions.
By Alan Caruba
I am proud of my work life (not the jobs, just the work).  Bait monger  Lawn mower  Paper boy  Windshield cleaner in a drive-in theater (if you don't know what a drive-in theater is there is no sense in you reading any farther)  Snack shack janitor in a drive in theater (ditto for drive-in theater)  Milling machine clean-up boy in a tool and die shop  Plastic injection press operator  Centurion in the US Army  Factory hand  Apprentice boy  Tool and die maker  Software user manual writer  Computer programmer  Ex-patriate par excellence  Engineering manager  Software test manager  Retiree  University administrator  System analyst  Retiree (2nd try)  Licensed amateur paleontologist  Retiree (3rd try)  Shovel bum (archaeology)  Retiree (4th try)  Delivery driver  Retiree (5th try)  Graduate student (skipped AA and BA due to the level of difficulty)  Retiree (finally got the drift of it) I have been writing for eight years and HAD six books on Amazon/Kindle. I am in the process of moving four of those books to my four blogs. Some horror, some twisted, some experimental, some essay.
Tuesday night is also the 2010 outdoor debut of the indomitable Nordic Semiconductor soccer team. Well perhaps that is too strong a word. The fact that I'm on the team should be an indication that we are no threat to the Champions league anytime soon. I think the goal differential last year was something on the order of 150-2, but we remain undaunted. I didn't play last year but I'm going to try and help out this season. I bought some shoes and soccer shorts yesterday and I borrowed some leg guards from Joel so I should be all set. Except for the part about not having a clue how to play soccer :)
I'm into cooking radish (白萝卜) quite often recently. In the past, I only buy radish when I want to cook three-colour carrot soup or for making steamed radish cake. Somehow, I dislike the mild bitter taste in the radish after cooking. But hey... the recent batch of radish tastes so good and has no bitter taste at all! Just last week, I prepared this beef stew with radish. I kept the leftover beef stock in the freezer, and used it as a stock base to prepare more radish stew for another day. And last night for dinner, I prepared pork knuckle, mushroom and radish stew. The radish was so delicious, after soaking up the flavours from the pork knuckle and mushroom.
Similar Species See canyon and Abert’s Towhees.
What liberal repealed the law that made it a crime for people to make false allegations against police officers? I think it'd be nostalgic to hang them by the feet and stone them.
From an article in The Seattle Times on workers at Amazon Fulfillment centres:
Next we added the octopus bits, notice how it has turned from the purpley grey colour to that richer pinky red colour. I understand that’s a very good sign when it comes to cephalopod cooking, it means you are on the right track.
The map shows the Darent Valley Path continuing along the lane, but a permissive path allows me to avoid the tarmac and follow the field edge, along the perimeter of the Woodland Trust’s Nine Hole Wood. A recently planted mixed of native species, the wood includes guelder rose and wayfaring tree, both of which are displaying a flamboyant flourish of pink and crimson autumn colour.
If I leave the house knowing what MUST get done, and what errands are optional, I don't get stressed when I don't get to do all the things I had planned.
These are the doctors, the civil servants, the bankers and clerks, the community leaders who have social capital and can shape opinions. They make up the heart of critical citizens, informed and engaged in issues.
No, I’m not God. God is in heaven. I’m out in the world.
Which brings me to my point. The united states of America (lower-cased for emphasis) aren't working. The umbrella that is our federal government is just not diverse and progressive enough to deal with the changing face of our vast country and the different regions within. The idea of 1,000 people representing nearly 400 million is absurd. Not to mention the fact that the majority of the members of congress are old white men, who are so out of touch with what is going on across this country that it's laughable to say they represent us at all. They're from a country where old white men rule, and they want to keep it that way. The uprising of women and minorities in this country is foreign to them, as are new ideas about relationships and protection of privacy and individual rights. They don't represent us anymore, and it's time we recognize that fact and move on.
Three armed men jumped off the back and grabbed Cronjé's handbag. Lubbe sped away and later returned to the scene with his wife, Mara, 49, and members of the Norkem Park police office.
XOXOXO!
Yellow Tory – Big Society – Big Business – Banks – Private provision for public goods – a pretend to care for young people.
Scraps of natural and yellow wool
Level 4: MP Cost: 24, Duration: 84 seconds, Defense: +20%, Abnormal Status Resistance: +12%, Elemental Resistance: +12%.
While the above steps if enacted would result in a general increase in wages and real income for working people, which would in turn increase spending and employment, it’s still the case that we do not have an effective safety net for preventing such swift declines in income and living standards in future recessions.
How about being there and share all the excitement of Another Paris? By the way, you don't have to run, you can just watch...
Oh Friends! Man cannot die till he bears the cross in the golden pentacle of his dream.
Emi was very happy with the stuff she sold, and felt she got a good idea of what sold well and what didn't, what price ranges worked, and similar useful info. She also met some very kind and helpful people, who shared their experiences with both selling handmade items and traveling.
Other essential equipment when starting a paintball gun. Always store your paintball inventory and gamers truly do have to practice more than the free game online paintball play, the free game online paintball play a most important contributor towards the free game online paintball play of unplanned insignificant paintball issues, players tend to be have the free game online paintball play of altering this velocity of about 300 ft/s. My first few times playing paintball was the free game online paintball play was patented in 1985. However, paintball shoppers of which is the free game online paintball play for Speed Paintball. These teams were comprised of the free game online paintball play to different countries nowadays, developing various types of guns or won't fly straight because they've gone bad, people will not have to think about buying a high quality guns but cost less than 400 dollars. But wow, that is often overlooked by many paintball markers surely have entirely changed the sport.
119 ft. Anthony Red Rose and Joe Lickshot
We're spending this weekend loading up furniture to go into the garage
Okay, so she may not be the greatest writer of all time but she sure is a damn good storyteller!
where green touches the hills ~
FREE subway art file (can download below!)
Tommy starts a new home daycare twice a week starting tomorrow. And I feel nervous and that familiar ache is there just as it has always been. I'm thankful that Todd takes drop-off duty because he knows my heart can't handle it.
Bog Frog Hop Kyle Mewburn & Rebecca Cool (Little Hare)
Alright, if for no other reason that to prove that I'm still alive, I need to make a blog post. And, I don't want to become a part of those statistics about defunct blogs. I was approaching the 6 month mark, and that is unacceptable. I will say that I have been training for a marathon for three months. This has seriously cut into my eating lifestyle.
Experience trumps book knowledge all day every day. There’s an old saying that those who know don’t tell and those who tell don’t know.
== The Return of WikiLeaks ==
Whenever I cook I also think my love. Reminds me how he always say he wanna cook for me to eat but ends up both of us cooking together.
I would l ike to enter into:
RESULTS FROM THE USPTO'S OPEN SOURCE MEETING: On February 16, the USPTO conducted a public meeting with the open-source software community to discuss issues of patent quality and prior art (the meeting agenda can be viewed here). Specifically, the meeting focused on the recent effort to get the "best" prior art references to the examiner during the initial examination process to improve patent quality, and continued the discussion on issues that were raised in the December 6th meeting. Like its predecessor, the February 16th meeting was open to the public.
Will IT come back?
This was an Eloise sort of day. Played with a little smush-faced dog (or three). Ate a raisin or two. Stood on my toes. Got dizzy and fell down. Made a terrible face. And here’s the thing of it most of the time I’m on the telephone. Or so Eloise would say.
With the convience of technology my kids have plenty of stuff to entertain themselves with on the iphone and ipad. I like that there are so many free apps you can download.
- 1 small glass of white wine
The way she holds her reticule is posed in the extreme
and we will find it.
A non-Blood Angels land speeder
Do you need this? Probably and probably not. As much as I like the packaging and the concept, I wish they would sell the top coats apart from the base. Because if you want all the colors, you will have much more white creme polish than you may want.
OK...OK...OK.. I GUESS I COULD HAVE A GIVEAWAY.... LEAVE ME A COMMENT AND I'LL RANDOMLY PICK THE NAMES OF 2 LUCKY PEOPLE AND SEND THEM THE WHOLE NEW FALL COLLECTION (that's 5 patterns - how cool)!! GOOD LUCK AND HAPPY COMMENTING!
4) Add the potato and tomato. Fry for a minute before adding the beansprouts. Fry for a few more seconds till dishing out.
Their top single has been “I Don’t want to miss a Thing” which reached #1 on the Billboard Charts in 1998.
and does not admit aloud
For the law of the Spirit of life has set you free in Christ Jesus from the law of sin and death. (Ro. 8:2)
By today’s standards, Saul Alinsky, the legendary organizer and author of Reveille for Radicals and Rules for Radicals, would have certainly been diagnosed with one or more disruptive disorders. Recalling his childhood, Alinsky said, “I never thought of walking on the grass until I saw a sign saying ‘Keep off the grass.’ Then I would stomp all over it.” Alinsky also recalls a time when he was 10 or 11 and his rabbi was tutoring him in Hebrew:
Mule Skinner Blues....Fendermen
I’m lost in space.
Allison Sekemoto has always lived on the fringe in her troubled city of New Covington. Her world has fallen victim to a plague that has wiped out much of humanity and left vampires in charge, treating the humans like cattle. Allison has always hated the vampires who rule her city, but when she is on the verge of death, she is offered the chance to live. Now a vampire, Allison, has to learn what it means to be the monster she hated.
When it comes to anime or books, while I do enjoy them as and after I watch/read them, actually starting is such a trial of will power that I fail more often than not. I truly don't know why, the reason for where this came from escapes me, though I have a couple guesses. One of which is that perhaps I am suffering from not knowing what it is I would like to do in 'the future'. I am, as I remember reading once, at the time in my life that I can devote everything to achieving my dreams without being burdened by responsibilities of life as imposed by our society. I don't need to worry about health (though my heart has always been having problems working right), nor about bills (though my dad borrowed money from me last week to pay the gas bill), nor even how others perceive me (though I'm going to begin taking some random course at a nearby community college soon so student loans stay off my back).
For November there were 33 single-family home sales, up from 11 in November last year. The increase was expected, considering there was virtually no market at the end of 2008, said Shore & Country owner and partner Russell Pruner.
I make sure to collect a deposit and get a good phone number. Before the three left, I ask the guy to empty his pockets to ensure he didn’t snatch anything else. He had somehow taken my keys, and handed them back. They were all sweaty and icky. It is waaaaaaay past closing time by now. And I know everyone is going to be mad at me for scheduling a high-maintenance thing on an already busy day–when I don’t work. . .
Around 28 weeks the movements become more “wriggly” and “squirmy.” This change in movement pattern is often interpreted as reduced movement and causes alarm. It is simply due to the fact that baby has less space.
Row 5) p3,k3,p3 accross
Served On Dill Trahana, Traditional
There is a theory that our bodies are like television channels, receptors for certain wavelengths, so that our “souls” actually reside outside our bodies, but what does that have to do with life in our bodies?.
Almost every picture I took of our camping trip is of Dillon or our friends' dogs, Dexter and Piper. There were FOUR people on this trip. I don't think I have 4 photos of people. SOO, since I went to the trouble of taking 792 pictures of the dogs - I figured I should share them with you. And yes, I do know that I am crazy.
I’m sure my mom was more than a little anxious about how her family would survive. Our house had three rooms, no indoor plumbing, no telephone, a coal heater and was miles up a “holler” away from civilization and even an hour away from her closest relatives. Life was already hard, but now she wouldn’t have any help.
I found myself asking one simple question.
Consideration.
Why did it take a sermon I swear I’ve heard before…..
Finally I decided to take Amelia to the University of Houston eye clinic. They have something called the NOVA clinic which is very specialized in examining the eyes of children who cannot verbalize. This clinic however has a lengthy waiting list and I was hoping to have some kind of a report to bring to Amelia's evaluation for special education which was only a couple weeks away. So we ended up going to another clinic that is called the Pediatric Center for Binocular Vision.
Body composition testing (particularly skinfold testing) offers an opportunity for teachers to deal with the cultural obsessions with thinness and body image that prevail in our society. The teacher can set a tone of acceptance for different body types and acknowledge the important genetic contribution to obesity. With greater tolerance for variation in fitness levels, children can better determine the relation of their body composition to health without fear of ridicule. Avoiding the use of body composition assessment does nothing to counter the perceived cultural pressure to be thin or the tendency of many children to become obese as adults.
Scripture Focus
SH: Oh no I won't.
It's been a "blah" sort of few weeks after the holidays. I think this happens every year, but it was especially obvious this year. We had a wonderful Christmas in Missouri with the Mahans, then came home to spend some time with Beth, Terry, and the star of the show, Tristen! We spend NYE at my mom and dad's with the entire Conner side of the fam, and I was off work for two weeks! Then reality set in: I got sick, went back to work, had an empty house, and had to face un-decorating for Christmas. It just feels a like a let down. But finally around mid-month, I start to bounce back.
There are two categories: Lifestyle/Health and Fashion/Beauty.
…..more to come….
The only issue was that it was chilly, and I mean chilly, this morning. Since I had no camera strap I couldn’t put one hand in my jacket pocket since it was holding the camera. But it was still worth it.
Paul has tried the fishing lark again but hasn't been as successful as he was the day it rained but he wont give up he will be out there come rain or shine.
In childhood a snow day means freedom! Freedom to stay in your pajamas until late in the morning. Then it's into snowsuits and caps and mittens and boots to explore the world of wonder created by freshly fallen snow. It's building snow caves and sliding down hills. It's making snow angels and snowmen and catching snowflakes on your tongue. It's shrieks of laughter as compact orbs of snow fly back and forth through the air. It's the steaming hot cocoa with marshmallows that awaits you when you return to the warmth of your house. A snow day is magical!
Given that the dealership failed to exercise due care to safeguard his car, he feels they should pay the shortfall. The dealership refused and insisted that he return their "courtesy" car last Tuesday.
Sixteen-year-old Gemma seems to have it all - carefree, pretty, and falling in love with the boy next door. But her greatest passion has always been the water. She craves late night swims under the stars, where she can be alone yet belong to the sea. Lately she's had company. Penn, Thea, and Lexi spend their nights dancing, singing, and partying on the cove--and one night Gemma joins them. When she wakes up groggy on the beach the next morning, she knows something has changed.
Oh, and lets not forget the monsters. As is the case with most tokusatsu series, there are plenty of interesting bad guys for Dogu-Chan to go up a cup size fighting. Ranging from human-fish hybrids who feed on human emotions, a man possessed by a bicycle, ghosts, school girls who transform into animals plus a a pair of demons who are mother and daughter.
I was certain that vows would protect from the past
So now we know what Cameron and Obama have in common: le maladie Anglo-Saxon, aka “as the real banks won’t cough up, let’s rob the taxpayers’ bank”. Sarkozy may be French, but il souffre aussi de l’Anglo-Saxonisme.
Kallie proceeded to email me the application along with lots of other information. And I immediately made my little Covenant Kids binder with sheet protectors and labels! I like to nerd things up whenever possible.
These reports and stories are not being made up out of whole cloth. Rather, they are fed by sources intent on sending a clear message: Do not attack.
Those cat cafes have been a bit controversial but I really think this is like making a scene about just a small hairball. Like the article mentioned above states, cats are not really the kind of furriends that will let humans play with them if they don’t feel like being cuddled. As long as they have a place of their own where they can go to nap, away from humans, that is fine.
awaiting the return of love
Note that the Canadian regulation does not define Tennessee whiskey as "straight bourbon whiskey that has been filtered through charcoal prior to barrel entry," which is what makes Tennessee whiskey unique according to the makers of Jack Daniel's.
Started reading: 8 April 2012
Anyway, that was back in early April. I came to the UK January 4th…so that was four months. Four months of no Chinese food. And though I enjoy my Burger King and KFC and Baldwin Pizza (guh, I’m so up for a Baldwin Pizza run right now..) as much as anyone else, going that long without real Chinese food is actually really difficult.
Are you still with me after that warning? Soap making is a simple process that is made difficult by using lye (caustic soda). There is absolutely NO WAY to make soap from scratch without using caustic soda/ lye. If you make sure you're alone when making soap, if you have all your ingredients measured out and have a clean and clear work area, you shouldn't have any problems. The entire process should take about 30 minutes. BTW, the process of soapmaking - saponification - neutralises the lye and by the time the soap is cured, no lye remains in the soap.
Thursday - Deer Tips with brown gravy, white rice, deviled eggs
Q-tip
I'm going to assume that you've talked with your agent about your concerns. Often I find that assumptions are made about what others are doing without really knowing the facts. For example, I'm constantly shopping books, talking to editors about the work my clients do, hounding publishers for money and contracts, etc., but I'm not always filling my clients in on every step I'm taking for them. For all you know, the agent could be talking you up to editors.
Holiday Wishes ... LMN ... 10 PM
A light comes from the sky. It is white and oval shaped in a horizontal manner. It dances in the sky from a distance. We comment and argue about the size of the object. Then, two more lights come near it. The objects dance together in the night sky. Suddenly, they fade out and are replaced by an even more impressive sight: an entire plot of land, propelled in a way or another by some invisible force. There are buildings and people on this piece of land. It’s as if they are transporting people to some location. That is all I remember. “
My first Rkatsiteli, I liked it – 89/100 points.
James Dalton, the ABI’s head of property insurance, said: “We are running out of time to ensure that people in high flood-risk areas can continue to get affordable insurance.
but we have 2 hours.
It’s also a somewhat scary reminder of Mathew 24:45-51. It is a parable about a servant and his master who is gone on a trip.
“Conversion may come under many shapes, and it may be brought about in many ways. With some men it needs a cataclysm, as a stone may be broken to fragments by the fury of a torrent; but with some it comes gradually, as a stone may be worn away by the ceaseless fall of a drop of water.”
I think this is just a natural thing...I think it will always be there...It will come and it will go...And I accept it.
I've been running all my life,
Annie Seaton lives on the edge of the south Pacific Ocean on the east coast of Australia. Recently retired from the world of full time work, she is fulfilling her lifelong dream of writing, and has had instant success! Her first two books were both published on the same day.
This candy will run till 8pm on thursday 22nd March and I will announce the winner on friday 23rd March. New candy will be posted on Saturday 24th.
However, there must not be kneejerk amendments.
time's slipping fast
Everyone wants to know the “secrets” of writing, so here are my 3 secrets of plotting:
That’s it from me for now,
As a final note, Fr. Oswalt's interview is one of 5 premiering in the next 3 weeks. Due to comments from some of the earliest subscribers to www.truerestorationpress.com/videos we have lowered our price for the annual subscription, which gives you access to all the video interviews ever done, as well as some of the beautiful ceremonies I've started to capture in High Definition. Long-form interviews like what we do here don't exist anywhere else in the Traditional Catholic world. Now we will be bringing you ceremonies in high-def also. Being a subscriber is cheaper than ordering the DVDs individually, and you get instant access instead of waiting for the DVD.
To know that for destruction ice
After leaving the launchpad of the firework with Satoshi and Menma’s mother making an appearance again, the group is kind of back to square one. In fact, they’re so clueless that they have they started to make up their own own theories again about why Menma didn’t got to Heaven. Incidentally, those theories involve blaming themselves. Anaru and Tsuruko yelling at each other is one of the highlights and a very well executed ‘conversation’. Poppo revealed he was there when he saw Menma’s body drifting downstream. That image has haunted him for years up till now. Even though the scenario is very understandable, it’s kind of too sudden, too late and a too desperate attempt to give him a story to tell too to earn much sympathy from the public. The others acting all dramatic by crying even louder doesn’t help, in fact, it only makes it worse.
Three beers available on our trip were Maverick, West Highland Black IPA and, of course, Jarl. I was in the mood for a Jarlfest and made this my beer of the day. I did dip my toe, metaphorically, into the other two beers but the thought of Jarl straight from the tap was too much of a temptation to resist.
First, and foremost, the script is great. While it is mostly an episodic recounting of one horrendous day in the life of a retail clerk, it rings true throughout. As somebody who has worked retail in my past, I can safely say that many of the experiences that happen to Dante and Randal are things that are encountered in the daily life of retail, if slightly hyperbolic. Who among us hasn’t wanted to spit water at a customer who was annoying us about some random bit of inanity that happened to be near the cash register? And what person hasn’t wanted to run down a list of over the top porn titles in front of a mom and her young child as a way of teaching her a lesson not to interrupt us?
JAPANESE SHIP DRILLING TEN KILOMETERS AT EXACT EPICENTER
However, for most of them, I need to redo the covers in a larger graphic suitable for print books, so, I followed the links of a few artists I like, and found a tutorial on creating a photorealistic face using Photoshop here.
If you want to decorate it: grate on a little plain chocolate, or if you feel your culinary skills have not been flexed sufficiently you could make some chocolate leaves. Now I should add a word of caution. This method uses actual rose leaves as a template. I have no idea from a ‘health and safety’ point of view whether this is acceptable. However if you want to have a go: melt some chocolate in a microwave on low for 30 seconds or so and stir to achieve a smooth molten loveliness. Pick 7 or 8 rose leaves and make sure that they are washed and thoroughly dried. You need to ensure some stalk is still attached to each leaf and hold onto that as you drag the underside of the leaf through the chocolate. Leave to set on a plate for an hour or two. Peel off the actual leaf carefully and use to decorate.
Conversation with him is a surreal experience, more so when he ordered a hot chocolate with an impish smile, dashing the notion that all serious literary people drink coffee – black.
”I, even I, am the Lord; and beside me there is no saviour.”
on a plane,
Robert Tucker, Ph.D., D. Min., President of New Life Spirit Recovery, Inc. and President of Association of Christian Alcohol and Drug Counselors Institute, Huntington Beach, California
4) We teach worldview through the study of and prayer for people groups and cultures in other parts of the world.
Gary Brewer, manager of the Oxfordshire and Buckinghamshire Gypsy and Traveller service, yesterday told Oxfordshire county councillors work on the land adjoining the current Redbridge Travellers site was being carried out.
The mind must be unraveled.
A new year, 1917, is dawning, and the Great War that ravages the world shows no sign of abating. Answering the siren call of Egypt once more, Amelia Peabody and her family arrive at their home in Luxor to learn of a new royal tomb ransacked by thieves. Soon an even more disturbing outrage concerns the intrepid clan of archaeologists: the freshly and savagely slain corpse of a thief defiling the ancient burial site.Yet this is nothing compared with the lethal fate that threatens Ramses. Besieged by the British and defended by formidable Turkish and German forces, the fortified seaport of Gaza guards the gateway to the Holy Land. Answering a call he cannot refuse from British military intelligence, Ramses must journey to this ancient, fabled city to undertake a mission as personal as it is perilous. Death will surely be his lot if he is caught or exposed. Meanwhile, Ramses's wife, Nefret, guards a secret of her own...
I am grateful that other kids want me around, too.
I know I give brass a hard time…a little too much of a hard time? Maybe.
Tonight's project is for the PTI Make-it-Monday challenge on Nichole Heady's blog. This week's challenge is to use patterned paper scraps to create a background for your card. This is actually something I've been doing for a while (and even as recently as last week), see...here, here, here, and here. For tonight's card, I stamped all of the patterned papers instead of using pre-pattered paper. This is a masculine one because as you all know, I seem to need these A LOT!!
While they were still speaking about this,r he stood in their midst and said to them, “Peace be with you.”
Oct 12 - Off Broadway - St. Louis, MO
Together, we have six amazing nieces and nephews. They are my inspiration. I'm also a third grade teacher trying to inspire little ones.
Or I could talk about how this little boy really believes at times that he is a cat named Puppa.
so onto all of our projects for you to have a look at.......
That being said, one could argue this is another attempt to find people “like me” and to make our voices heard as if we are different from you! We are all not so different from you. We all want the same thing, to have a place in the world where we do not live in fear of having to defend ourselves at every turn. Especially from other marginalized groups such as ourselves. To be loved and to love. Bisexuality exists, and if that scares you I will not apologize. To dismantle homophobia we must encourage bisexual visibility. We must promote inclusion and we must be open to change and fluidity. Most of all we must be willing to admit that no one fits perfectly in the box our society has created for us and we continually perpetuate, we all deviate. Deviation from the “norm” is a very scary place for many people and it spews hatred like a dragon spews fire. I’m tired of getting burned…
I managed to work on photographing clothes on the mannequin and trying to teach myself more about lighting. Some improvement this week but my light stands are not stable enough and the clamps on the big lamps don't do that great of a job. I will address certain issues next week and tried to improve my set up. Meanwhile, here are some photos from this week....
Of course, not all the supporters of Amendment One are as ignorant as Alex and Chase. WSOC interviewed Doris and Boyd Ausmann, who live down the road from Alex’s parents, and although they support the anti-gay amendment, they weren’t impressed with Alex’s antics.
A couple of months back, en route to a friend’s birthday party in Hastings and running early, I pulled in at Pevensey Bay because the map told me that there were Martello towers there. I’d also read something about plotland developments in the area and was wondering whether I would come across any interesting old wooden buildings or railway carriages made into bungalows. I didn’t find any railway carriages, but one of the Martello towers proved well worth the stop.
The Bersih (Clean) group that is leading the protest says it will obey the ban but will march as close as possible to the square, raising the possibility of a repeat of violent clashes that marred Bersih’s last major protest in July 2011.
10-ounce FR knit: a blend of 55% modacrylic and 45% cotton
What’s the worst place for a guy to hit on you?
You aren’t obliged to go.”
Had such a situation arisen in, say, 1960 – when the Cold War was at its height, people remembered the Gestapo, and Orwell’s 1984 was a famous book being made into TV plays and films – the outcry would have been universal, the demand for the whole edifice to be deconstructed irresistible. In 2011, the response is, “Yeh – whatever”.
As it fitfully blows, half conceals, half
I must have drifted off because the next thing I knew was waking up feeling a bit rough and thinking how we know for sure that birds are really singing when they make such a racket. If it was singing, why do they sing the same song all their lives. Don't they ever get fed up with it and have the urge to expand their repertoire?
As I prepare to submit this blog, I know that my perception of bloggers has changed. Yes, some blogs I read this semester were rants and ill-founded, but so many more were well written, perfectly timed, humourous, and insightful. So I will concede that I no longer have the same view of bloggers than in January. But this may well be my very last blog.
Each member of Battle Force 2000 has only ever had 1 figure released of them. Hasbro has never bothered to revisit the concept in either the new sculpt or modern sculpt eras. Perhaps because calling a futuristic fighting force Battle Force 2000 in the year 2012 would be kind of dumb. They haven’t appeared in any of the modern comics produced by various publishers either. In the original Marvel series where death was a rare thing, the entire team (with the exception of Dodger for some reason) was killed as soon as Hasbro gave their blessing. Writer Larry Hama clearly had no love for the concept. My favourite figure of the group was their leader, Maverick. I actually don’t recall if he was officially the team leader, that may have just been in my head. His design is very sci-fi with a jumpsuit and silver shoulder pads but not so farfetched that he looks out of place with the rest of the Joe team. His helmet is one of the best removable Joe helmets ever designed. It’s cool looking and covers his face entirely except for the eye holes which line up just right. When on, the helmet doesn’t look oversized or clunky which can be tough to pull off. The face sculpt has a lot of character, he looks more like a hard-nosed test pilot who’s been through hell as opposed the giggling man-child persona I saddled him with. I actually think this is a great figure and I would love to see all the members of Battle Force 2000 revisited in a modern day 7 pack akin to the Dreadnok and Renegades packs released last year. Fingers crossed. 7 out of 10.
5. Boneless rib eye steak, $4.99/lb. at Sunflower (through 4/13/11)
Nonetheless the idea wasn't completely abandoned. Thus it was we booked one of London's top Indian restaurants, Cafe Spice Namaste. It is rather convenient for our flat and falls into E's definition (albeit at the bottom end of her expectations.) We have been before, but were vaguely disappointed and it was some time ago, so we duly reported, had highs and not so highs and left full up, but feeling perhaps it lacks the precision of cooking, particularly in spicing and sauces, that is so important in Indian food and that you will get in say, Mother India's Cafe in Glasgow. But this isn't about the grub.
-Sheamus attempts it again but gets rolled up for a 2.
- In London, England, wife beating is legal just as long as it is not after 9pm and it doesn't disturb the neighbours.
I hope you enjoy my recipe for Meringue Pillows. It’s the perfect spring dessert for your Passover or Easter table.
What was hard was seeing the kids frolicking in the schoolyard at drop-off: the boys suddenly crisp in their khakis, the girls suddenly gorgeous in their graduation dresses.
The recitation of the Qur’an on the style of the Quraysh tribe was confines by Hazrat Usman (Radhiallahu Anhu).
Alien3
bird, blood, everything revealed the only Existence that Is.
This won't pass muster with them. I absolutely guarantee this. The reason is that even IF this is fair use, the creators of the television show can sue you for infringement. It doesn't matter if you are right: court costs will kill you.
By and large, one should not judge the strength of a series by its premiere episode. With American programs, pilots are generally the first aired, and they usually suck. Even if they're "good," they pale in comparison with the rest of the series. Although not a proper pilot so much as it is simply the second episode they shot and the first one aired on the BBC, this one is no exception. Not to say it's awful, in fact, it's still very watchable - plenty of classic Python bits to be found here - but the moments where the show is off it feels like a cheap skit put on at a talent show.
So I guess we’re okay now. One burden off my chest. I never really intended to declare war with her. We were like sisters until we fought over her evil mother.
Here you find an extract from Sibelius’s suite written in 1905 as incidental music for Maeterlinck’s play. It is a very tranquil and beautiful piece scored for woodwinds and pizzicato strings.
(Jewish math genius shown in pic)
- Flame Unit: Range Template, S4, AP5, Assault 1
It needs my full attention see.
And that’s not even getting into the way the safety industry creates a picture of the world as super-dangerous (“Is your baby about to be SCALDED?!” “) so we will freak out and buy anything they’re selling.
I've not mocked Brake properly for a while so let's have a look at their website. The first thing you see pretty much sums it all up.
that I am still thinking about pretty much every day.
In Australia we have just passed Imbolc/Candlemas and we are turning towards the light. Spring is coming after a long and harsh winter. Kate Bush and I also share a love of washing and washing lines and so I've posted a picture of a lovely washing line above to herald Imbolc. The light is coming!
Answer in the comments.
How infinite and astonishing
A smoldering, longing feeling for me from you
It will not work as members of the British National Party will not give in.
Hamburger
Many people are planning weddings this time of year especially if their wedding is scheduled to take place in the summer months. My own brother is planning a wedding and we are all eagerly anticipating June 18th when we will gain a new member to our family......officially.
Leaves fall into your bag.
The objective of the present work was to evaluate the broadest toxic effect of some synthetic additives of colorants and/or flavors on different body organs and metabolic aspects in rats. A number of chemical food color and flavor additives are routinely added during processing to improve the aesthetic appearance of the dietary items. However, many of them are toxic after prolonged use. In this experiment, a total of 100 male albino rats of Spargue Dawley strain were divided into 10 groups: G(1) was fed basal diet and served as control, G(2): basal diet + Brilliant blue (blue dye, No. 2, 124 mg/kg diet), G(3): basal diet + carmoisine (red dye, No. 3, 70 mg/kg diet), G(4): basal diet + tartrazine (yellow dye, FD & C yellow No. 5, 75 mg/kg diet), G(5): basal diet + trans-anethole (4.5 g/kg diet) G(6): basal diet + propylene glycol (0.25 g/kg diet), G(7): basal diet + vanillin(1.25 g/kg diet), G(8): basal diet + Brilliant blue + propylene glycol, G(9): basal diet + carmoisine + trans-anethole, G(10): basal diet + tartrazine + vanillin for 42 successive days. All food colorants mixed with or without flavor additives induced a significant decrease in body weight, hemoglobin concentration and red blood cell count. Also there was a significant decrease in reduced glutathione content; glutathione-S-transferase and superoxide dismutase activities in both blood and liver compared to control group. On the other hand, a significant increase in serum alanine aminotransferase, aspartate aminotransferase, alkaline phosphatase activities, bilirubin, urea, creatinine, total protein and albumin were observed in all test groups when compared to control group. Finally, it is advisable to limit the uses of these food colorants and/or food flavor additives especially those used by children.
Stirring well with each addition
Many of those ideas need to be turned on their heads:
Holy carp, you have never seen a smile like Sprout's when she is playing with it. It's her ball, man, her ball! So I figure it's okay that we went off budget. Honestly, it's the best fifty cents we've ever spent.
From Highland Hellcat by Mary Wine
We would go for long stretches (sometimes several months) with everything being great. It was wonderful. We were happy. We enjoyed each other. We wanted to be together. But even then I was on guard, always knowing that things could change in an instant, always ready to protect my kids and get them away from him. And something would go wrong.
Wednesday 23 May, 2pm – 3pm, Bus 1.29
These are the friendship bracelets I have made for myself and my 3 best friends, Ellie, Gemma and Katie. Each bracelet has the first letter of their name and a variety of beads. Gemma's also has a teddy bead as she is a good hugger!
ANC Youth League leader Julius Malema had to “vacate his position”, the party's national disciplinary committee said on Thursday.
Sometimes it shows.
I guess I should start packing right? Maybe after I catch up my PVR'd Big Brother!
"Over the past few weeks there have been worries with Romanians. Indeed, a number of bag thefts have been noted. We ask you to redouble your vigilance. Besides, all sightings of Romanians must be reported."
This is going to be an interesting year ~ in ways you hadn’t imagined. You’ll go out on a limb, and try something new. It will take you places you never imagined, and show you parts of yourself you didn’t know existed. You’re stronger and smarter than you think! But with the good, comes the bad. You’ll walk away from a friendship that doesn’t benefit you. Just because someone has been in your life a long time doesn’t mean they deserve to be in your future. Don’t compromise your integrity ~ in the end your character is all you’ve got! Open yourself up to change and don’t be so afraid that things aren’t working out on your timeline. The Universe isn’t concerned with your timeline, cupcake!
I told her just what I had seen and she assured me that life in that house was simply unbearable on account of that same old lady. She said an old woman, the exact counterpart of the one I described, had owned the house years ago and had been murdered by her son-in-law, who secured a large sum of money that she had secreted in the house. He burned her body in the cellar and it had lain there for years until the bones were finally discovered by some men digging in the cellar. As the family were all dead nothing could be done toward bringing the murderer to justice. Ever since the discovery of the bones the house had been haunted by the woman’s ghost. Doors were slammed and opened, locks were unlocked, windows were rattled and unearthly groans heard. She said she had moved into the house only five days before, but, although she had paid a month’s rent in advance, she would lose that and move out."
tip 1. download CRAIGEASY, a button you stick on your tool bar which allows you to browse the listings with IMAGES. i don't do craig without it!
About eight years ago, when I decided to pursue a career in children’s writing and illustration, I was completely unprepared for how hard it would be to make the shift from painting landscapes and flowers to illustrating a story. First of all, I was accustomed to unconstrained freedom in my paintings. If I needed an extra limb or two on a tree to balance the composition, I just painted them in. No one would ever know. But with illustrations, I can’t just add a couple of extra toes to my main character if I need to balance things out!
For the postman bringing
My hair has gone through 3 different shades of red in the last few months......
Now for you folks who are not the barbecuing and grilling enthusiast, this might seem like a very long list of ingredients, a lengthy process, a lot of steps to take in getting chicken on the table. But it is not really, in fact, you do not need to do all four, but it is sho 'nuff good. Most items you should have in your cabinets and as for the time taken, well like most delectably well eats, time really means little when the foods are so enjoyed.
III. Develop and implement a customer strategy for the next two years (93,94) that indicated to the customers that IBM had returned and was there to serve them.
Taser Bracelets for Air Travelers
After trying on a few Hanboks on Gwen, finally we found one which she likes. The Hanbok was quite expensive. It cost Rp260k (around RM80).
The article by Mainichi Shinbun on September 13 (linked below) summarizes the findings well enough. According to the article, the government researchers at Japan Atomic Energy Research and Development Agency and at Tokyo University announced the result of their analysis that the explosion of Reactor 4 reactor building at Fukushima I Nuclear Power Plant on March 15 may have been caused by a large amount of hydrogen gas produced by water radiolysis – dissociation of molecules by nuclear radiation in the Reactor 4 Spent Fuel Pool
However, I'll persevere... b/c I really enjoy the whole concept of taking a time out and talking/thinking about life.
Andrew Levkoff is the self-published author of one of my favourite historical novels, The Other Alexander. It’s a greatly underrated novel and this interview definitely sheds some light on why Mr. Levkoff decided to pick such an unusual figure in Roman history to write about. Today he graciously agreed to do an interview with me, so if you love hearing about Roman history, self publishing and tips for aspiring authors, please read on!
those who sick to the point of death of the soul are raised to new life
I loved Ali G. I loved Borat. I thought Bruno was really funny in places but went to far in others, so I am looking forward to seeing what Cohen has in store for us with The Dictator (aka Admiral Aladeen).
Lily Lapenna is founder and CEO of MyBnk.
Okay, this post is going to have to be short and sweet because I’m in the “Sunday night zone” and have a gazillion things to do before Monday morning hits.
I am glad to see this. Richard Lugar is a good man and an able public servant and no hint of scandal has ever been associated with him. Indiana should be proud to have had him as our Senator. Still, he is eighty years old and has been in the Senate for thirty-six years. No one can stay in Washington for that long without becoming out of tough with the people back home. It is a continual source of frustration for Conservatives that the people we elect to serve us become steadily more acclimated to the Washington culture and drift leftwards. Lugar is not as bad as many, but I think it is time for him to step down.
Service was very good, and there were a number of other menu items which sounded intriguing. I want to return to check out more of their cuisine, especially once they start carrying Sake. So, based on my limited experience, it is worth checking out, though I would not recommend the karaage.
When the Austin Fire Department switched from horse-drawn engines to motorized ones, the last AFD fire horse was donated to St. Mary’s Academy, where he spent his declining years pulling the surrey that the Academy girls would take grocery shopping.
He was just a little over 13 months. Unfortunately, mama missed it! :( We were at church and I was working in the office, and he was getting loved on in the sanctuary from some of our church family. It's bittersweet missing such a huge milestone, but I got to witness a 'reenactment' a few minutes later!
“Let’s not view this in the context of the peace negotiations. The massacre was a violation of the ceasefire.”
I finished the first complete draft in January 2010. I’d reached my own limit, and needed help to polish and strengthen the structure, so it wouldn’t be just a ‘novel in stories’ much as I enjoy those, but a different beast. With an Arts Council Grant for the Arts, I was able to pay for a period of mentoring with the wonderful novelist Maggie Gee, whose own work is so beautifully structured and lucid, I knew I had a lot to learn from her. She was (and is!) incredibly generous. We’d meet and she’d give painstakingly detailed feedback on the manuscript and I’d go off and work on it - I was very disciplined! She might comment on the prose, and I’d always marched up and down reading it out loud - so
It turned out our CEO had pocketed the $10,000 speaker fee himself and
HERBED STUFFED TROUT – 30.00
34. The locusts in the 1999 film, The Mummy, were mostly computer-generated, however, some live grasshoppers were used. Hours before filming they were chilled in a refrigerator to make them more sluggish.
I made it back just in time for my cancer to return with a raging vengeance. And I spent all last year wishing my cancer was gone. Now that my cancer is dying, I immediately assume life should be back to “normal.” Whatever that means. And such were the thoughts I wrote out last Wednesday to the wonderful women that has stuck with me through all of the craziness I’ve just shared with you.
At our Haikufest last Saturday in the Chicago Metro area, members of the Haiku Society of America read samples of their poetry to a large, appreciative audience. Haiku is both a poem and a meditation that captures the moment.
In fact, Rusche admitted that these numbers may even be low.
A quite good looking bar lady, dressed in bright leopard skin attire is looking at me. She sees me and smiles then taps the arm of some bloke that is sitting at the bar on a stool.
Energy level: Crazy good! I have felt so energized lately and I love it! Last night hubs and I went on a bike ride and I felt like I could keep going and going! And then last night I stayed up until 10:30 pm and then even after we went to bed I continued to chat away to my trying-to-fall-asleep husband until close to 11 pm! I’m wondering how long this energy spurt will last because it feels too good to be true.
I flicked to a story about two jazz musicians exploring a foot fetish for the first time, and while I read his fingers started very gently stroking the hollows between my thighs and my pussy, sending delightful shivers of pleasure through me – a perfect start, the sensation not directly sexual but allowing my senses time to unfurl and begin to awaken. Slowly, taking his pace from the way my body shifted and relaxed, he began to probe my increasingly wet pussy lips with his fingers, then pushed gradually deeper and deeper inside me as I tried to keep my voice smooth and steady. By the time I had finished reading, my body was yearning for more, and I could feel the deep excitement of the endless possibilities before me.
This documentary was made on the occasion of the retrospective of the director’s work at the 2nd Pusan International Film Festival. Director Kim was accompanied by cinematographer Jeong Il-seong and actress Park Jeong-ja at the press conference. The room was practically empty. Clearly choked up and eyes welling with tears, Jeong said that he felt sorry that only one director deigned to attend Kim’s press conference. Know who that was? Hint: he just completed his hundredth film last year.
Jacobs been needed a quiet spot in the house where he can study and get homework done everyday. Plan: Find a desk!
As always, Hershery's chocolate is top quality and comes in many variations to fit your wants and needs!
So why not experience starting your day at Grand County? It could be a lot more fun! And if you like the place, go and find a property that suits your preferences. Talk to the best brokers in the area like RE/MAX Resorts of Grand County. Try visiting the website of one of their most responsive broker at www.GrandLakeMountainProperty.com.
Or there's always the "je suis pleine" to mean I'm full but actually finish a meal with "I'm pregnant."
My son Matthew normally doesn't like to eat cake. I know. I don't get it either. But we were recently at his friend's birthday party, and when all the games had ended and it was time to eat, he finished his pizza and then promptly told me he wanted to go home. I said we couldn't leave until we'd had birthday cake, to which he declared he didn't want any cake! I told him that he didn't have to eat any of it, but that he had to stay long enough to sing happy birthday and watch his friend blow out the candles.
It was a fun time for sure..
What the hell was I doing here? It was no use trying to pretend to myself that I’d just stopped by while in the neighbourhood, because I’d taken a ten-minute detour through Reading traffic to swing by here on my way back from Zoe’s place. No, I had in fact hit a new low: predatory older man stalking nubile twink at the bloody playground. I was a fucking chickenhawk.
I am hoping if the weather permits to refinish our free coffee table (The one we found on the side of the road this summer!) this weekend. With the semester back in swing, my husband will be working some this weekend and it just seems like now is the time! Unless it is freezing or rainy....in which case I will table this project yet again. Har har! I really need to organize...so we will see.
Finish: Medium-long. Balanced on a sweet/dry combo then a little minerally.
Nokia Siemens Networks’ new TD-LTE products include a 4 pipes radio frequency module based on its pipe concept in addition to three new data devices. The new TD-LTE products aim to help accelerate the profitable delivery of mobile broadband.
It is palpably not the Opposition. The Opposition on their part are seriously working with the marginalized minorities as well as the majority race in instilling peace and unity in the society.
Isn’t this super cool?, In fact the skills and characteristics we discovered through this exercise would make a super natural human. Some very important ones that tops the never ending, never complete list are : Critical thinking, divergent thinker, time management, planning – proactive/ reactive, self- disciplined, well- organized, multitasking, being happy, having an overview, staying calm, communication, passion, achievement, reflector, embracing new ideas, overrides fear of failure, hard/smart worker, and so on….
Congrat to all the winners!
Lace-Trimmed Cami: Few things get me as excited as a towering stack of colorful tanktops with white lace trim. Add in the buy-one-get-one-free thing, and I was definitely crying joyous tears in my dressing room, slapping myself in the face and whispering, "Keep it together, Winona, for the love of god!"
In the bowl of a stand mixer, using a paddle attachment, cream the butter and the sugar until fluffy. Add the lemon zest and beat to mix. Add the eggs, one at a time, beating well after each addition. Scrape down the sides of the bowl and mix again.
George Zimmerman has yet to be locked up, and that is a miscarriage of justice. I will reiterate what I’ve said in previous posts; I’m not trying to declare that George Zimmerman is guilty, but this shooting death should be treated like any other murder that takes place. We have his statement that it is self defense; he needs to be arrested, taken in for questioning, and the burden of proving self-defense will be on him just as it would be on anyone else in a potential murder investigation.
I've been having a bit of a reorganise the last couple of days, you know I'm feeling better in myself when I start moving things around and generally having a fiddle with the pretties in the house. I was getting bored of the dining room so that's had most of the treatment. This is now my peaceful window cill next to the PC, this is as close to the "all cream" look as I get (and yep, that is a bit of duck egg blue creeping in haha) and I managed one little window cill!
There was the petrol strimmer -it really kicked the shit out of the triffids.
I am now a Fleur de Lys convert, and I would sincerely want my next birthday cake to come from their bakeshop!!!
They are everywhere….in all cities: the homeless. What do we think when we see a homeless person? Do we make judgements? Or are we truly compassionate or somewhere in between? Elle and David Page became aquainted with some of Boulder Colorado’s homeless in October 2010 and they wanted to share the stories of the people they met. Together they formed a writing team who interviewed men and women of Boulder who provide a glimpse into their humanity and uniqueness.
As a member of the Flyers, Carkner established himself as one of the fearless and toughest players on a team loaded with size. His career year offensively came in 1988-89 when he scored eleven goals and helped the team reach the semi-finals. In 1993, he was traded again, to Detroit for Yves Racine and a 4th-round draft choice, and after two years with the Winged Wheel he was given his outright release.
It was also noticeable how much more comfortable the president and his adoring media are with his middle name “Hussein”. A word which it almost amounted to sacrilege to mention, mere months ago during the Democratic conventions and subsequent election campaign, is now flaunted like some totem of the multi-cultural victory he and his followers view his election to have been.
Pogonia ophioglossoides is commonly known as the rose pogonia or the snakemouth orchid and is famous for its scent that smells just like raspberry.
Publication Date: January 3, 2012
I hope you guys found yesterday's sourdough post informative. Maybe a few of you even found yourself in the kitchen putting a starter together?? If so, you're in luck, because that means you're only a few days away from having these pancakes in your life, and that's a very good thing! If you happen to already have a sourdough starter in your fridge, no need to wait - you can make these pancakes for your family this weekend! Everyone will be glad you did :)
Sentencing Mylotte, Stewart and English, Judge Myrella Cohen said was satisfied occult practices were behind their sinister activities.
Fat chance.
Due to privacy concerns, Dr. O and his team are focused on uses in the distance range of less than four inches.
The Guardian added, “Among the dead was a young girl in a green and red dress who had been shot in the forehead. The bodies of other victims appeared partially burned. A villager claimed they had been wrapped in blankets and set on fire by the killer.” The mainstream media was quick to follow the lead of “U.S. military officials” who “stressed that the shooting was carried out by a lone, rogue soldier, differentiating it from past instances in which civilians were killed accidentally during military operations.”
I turn to that quiet and sane world that belongs to Thatha, his magic grain, me and my dear reader….
So maybe it will take an angel,
There's an old saying: When you fail to plan, you plan to fail. But the pattern of the Obama administration has me wondering if we're seeing the inverse: when you plan to fail, you fail to plan. That is, if American contraction and retreat is your goal, why would you make any plans to revive the economy or win wars?
Ken looked down in time to see the golden blade of burning light withdraw into his chest as the Sith shut the weapon down. The world pitched as the Jedi was no longer able to control his legs and the floor rose up to meet his with a crash that he was dimly aware broke a bone in his wrist he landed on it. From where he lay, he could see the Sith’s boots turn away from him and calmly walk toward the Senator. Somewhere in the back of his mind, Ken was cursing the aging, fat Duros for being too stupid to run when he’d had the chance. For wasting the lives of his personal guards. For wasting Ken’s life.
State investigators say Greer and the party's former executive director, Delmar W. Johnson III, secretly set up a shell company called Victory Strategies to divert party money and enrich themselves. Greer was charged Wednesday with fraud and money laundering.
Sovietization was the process by means of which all institutions, cultural activity, politics, sport, education, religion and family life were subject to strict surveillance and monitored in accordance with Marxism-Leninism. Censorship was routine and exceptionally severe. Civil society, in effect, ceased to exist. In National Socialist Germany this process would have been known as Gleichschaltung or harmonisation.
It climbed the tree with the red berries. Up and up and up it went to the top, feasting all the way. None of the humans on the trail moved. "Should we wait?" the man uphill asked. "Probably. He went up that tree pretty fast. I'm sure he can come down it even faster," the father replied. So they waited. And waited - the family on the downhill side, the couple on the uphill side. Another couple walked up behind the family. They were young - mid 20s at best. They waited, too. A group of about 7 arrived with the couple on the uphill side. They were louder - more boisterous. The young couple on the downhill side decided to try going past the bear in the tree.
In order to accomplish this, we need to find a vanity that is not very deep (16-19") and/or that takes up less space than a cabinet style vanity (i.e. pedestal sink). To throw another wrench into this decision, we plan to have some built-in linen storage in this bathroom, so that needs to coordinate with everything.
-Matte Dark Ochre Brown from Peggy Sage to blend out the black
DESIGNATED FAT GIRL by Jennifer Joyner
Brazil has been flirting with recession since the second half of last year, and President Dilma Rousseff has expressed hopes that lower rates will help spur spending and spark a return to the high growth rates that made the country one of the world’s most dynamic economies.
Jonathan Arnston and I are co-hosting (for the second year), a blog series on GA parent (and guardians) in Children's Literature. Specifically this year, we'll be looking at Young Adult books.
KATE BUSH
hat would probably be my wedding day. Or the births of my children
It’s on more than one occasion, then, that I’ve had a quietly challenging opening week to the new year, but none I can remember has been quite so difficult as the one that’s just passed. It was perfectly predictable, of course, what with a round of chemo mere days in (now altered, thanks to a new schedule, to require two trips to the hospital on consecutive days), and the subsequent shitness that came with it; shitness which, I think, P and I are fast learning to manage on the physical front, but still struggling with on the emotional front. And so, when you foolishly throw into that debilitating (albeit temporary) depression a nutty necessity to make pledges about what you’d like to do differently in the coming year – and then not just find yourself satisfied at having drawn up a list, but actively squirreling away on Resolution #1 beneath a slanket at 5am on January 4th… well, you’re just asking for trouble, ain’tcha?
Sorry that I keep missing my weigh in day. I actually do weigh in that day. I just don't seem to find the time to post.
Joanna Paul / Colour Diary / 18-19
The Yeagers had been married for 72 years and died holding hands. The family requested that the couple be placed in the same casket hand-in-hand. The funeral home was able to grant this final request. The couple were later cremated, their ashes mixed.
I love a challenge; so this was quite fun to figure out.
Add remaining ingredients and cook until heated through.
About YNL- YouNeverLose.com is an amazing auction site that’s transforming the way people shop and play online. To play, you buy gift cards from retailers like Macy’s, GAP or Sears, and get them sent to you with free shipping. Then, for every dollar you spend on gift cards, you get free reward points to play in auctions to win even more amazing gift cards – think Amazon and Starbucks - at more than 90% off! How does scoring a $25 Amazon gift card for $0.24, or a $50 Wal-Mart gift card for $2.25 sound? It’s pretty amazing, and people like you are grabbing these great deals around the clock! Best of all, there’s no risk to play in the auctions – since you get reimbursed with gift cards for every dollar you spend.
At that moment in time a little person wearing big spectacles entered the kitchen...It was Mr Mole..
More journal pages:
You could do all 5 steps. Each one an increased level of desperation to catch some zzzzz's. But lets face it,
A sinister chuckle escaped from Lord Hastings’ lips. “Don’t take it personally, Miss Thorn. You’re a servant. I treat you no differently than I treat anyone else in my employ.”
61. To Sir, With Love (Sidney Poitier) – Huge Sidney fan.
Kids going in five directions - end of school year hoopla
to see
You done good, kid
Lately...
And I thank you, ever so much, for reading my words, for being concerned, for being yourselves, and for being alive. If you’re reading this, you need to know that, even if I don’t know you personally, I still think that you’re so special and so vital to this world. I want you to keep on being who you are, keep on striving for what you want, and never forget just how important your story is. If you’ll try to do that, I promise I’ll try to do that, too :)
Table 3: Financial and Operational Metric Definitions
The Kolkata-based retailer is planning to add products such as deodorants, sun glasses and shoes in its portfolio in the next 12 months. “We are ready to launch eye-wear products in the next three to four months, with a price tag of between Rs 1995 and Rs 2995,” Mr Ladsaria said.
This looked so pretty, and after having a big dollop on my crumpets this morning I can confirm it tastes really great, full of big chunks of fruit, with a faint hint of vanilla..............your neighbours will love you.
A relationship breakdown, a friendship loss, illness - a long list of emotional draining experiences.
I rock as a drive through guy. This is satisfying because it feels good to be awesome.
I had happened upon the teachings of Ramesh Balsekar who resided in Mumbai and thus I journeyed to the great unknown.
Probably Purple, and yes I use it alot in my designs. I also love Turquoise, the color and the stone! I try to stretch beyond those boundaries as much as possible though cause not everybody is as in love with purple as I am.
I can't even tell you what color it is. I want to say that this beautiful grey-blue color is a Martha Stewart brand and I think it was called "Dolphin." Don't quote me on that though.
Gotye picked two songs that have quite the dramatic (in the case of “Eyes Wide Open,” dramatically abrupt) ending. I appreciated his ability to continue to belt it out while banging on those drums. B+
This was a very traditional cassoulet, and absolutely delicious. As fun as this can be to make at home, it just isn't worth the time when I can come here and have this for under $25. This was a white bean stew base, with great tomato flavors. It was then topped with some braised pork belly, duck leg confit, and a delicious pork sausage. The flavors and seasoning here were right on, and this was a winner! I would definitely order this again for all of the different elements, and that says a lot considering I am not a big white bean fan.
It worked!
DECODING SOCIETY CHORUS (6)
No hangers for clothes ~ only one nail.
You will do it tomorrow or when you have time? I tell you what, just for me and for the vulnerable out there, do it NOW!
Mount Asama has been active for several thousand years, and frequently ejects small amounts of ash from its crater. It last erupted in August 2008, however, its last major eruption occurred on September 1, 2004, spewing hot rock and sprinkling ash as far as 180 km away, and causing damage to crops. In 1783 it erupted violently causing extensive damage to property and killing as many as 2,000 people.
She was disappointed when I explained that I never even saw punk fashion until I was out of college and was going to clubs. Alas, she doesn't realize that the 1970s was about Earth Shoes, Ditto jeans, baseball jersey tee shirts (my favorite one said "32", for some special reason that now eludes me), plaid pants, and lots and lots of polyester knits, especially for dresses and pant suits, which girls were allowed to wear to school in the 7th grade on Fridays only.
At the outbreak of our Muslim Troubles, we will have an archipelago of Muslim-dominated areas of towns and cities loosely strung out across the Greater London area, the West Midlands, and the North West of England. Some of these areas will be in a state of outright hostilities with the surrounding British populations, some relatively peaceful but in a state of high tension and on the verge of hostilities. There is a crucial point here that must be understood if one is to have any grasp of the basic strategic situation that will obtain between British and Muslims: if one cannot extend numerical control over the enemy population in a tribal conflict of the type we are headed for, then extending geographical control over that population becomes a matter of overriding importance. In other words, if one cannot wave a magic wand over the Muslim population of the UK and make it disappear, then one must confine it to certain areas of the country, outside of which the ability of its members to contaminate and degrade the lives of the British people is reduced virtually to zero. Growing Muslim numbers combined with a lack of geographical control will create such an intolerable situation that it must and will be violently rejected sooner or later.
STARRING: Sylvester Stallone, Arnold Schwarzenegger, Bruce Willis, Jason Statham, Jet Li, Chuck Norris, Jean-Claude van Damme, Dolph Lundgren, Terry Crews, Randy Couture, Liam Hemsworth
1 can (15 oz.) kidney beans, drained, reserve 3 tablespoonfuls
Here is where I spent much of yesterday afternoon...cat napping and reading, while the hubby, Ellen and Izzy took real naps inside.
My mom once told me “you don’t get a second chance to make a good first impression.” Mom was right – first impressions are milestones especially with regards to onboarding newly hired workers. A first impression can have significant implications for employee engagement, productivity, and retention.
3 1/2 cups sugar
we were blessed with incredible weather, a lodge that slept 22 and a black bear to boot in our backyard. shenanigans ensued, flipcup and hand waves were all the rage. and i realized just how much i love me some fireball with these group of gals.
Paul Ludik from the NFCI was quick to dismiss any notion that it was foreign to the planet, saying the metal alloy was known to man and used in spacecraft.
oh....wait...you have to WORK at marriage, right?
Sir Gus, a giraffe who used to live with the Gypsies, but then RUNNOFT to his new family, a little girls nursery just packed with others just like him.
The second question comes from Lib Dem county councillor Bill Boulter, who asked officers to examine the recently published list of Parsons' journeys in the chauffeur-driven civic car. Looking at a sample 22-month period, they found a further 27 that had not been included.
Michael Zimmer, a specialist in the field of technology integration in secondary education, produces this blog. If you like “Top 10“ lists, Zimmer posts several on this blog. Zimmer examines the use of Facebook, Twitter and YouTube in the high school classroom.
When there’s a problem, you know what button to press: you can pray in the
“See you at the Home today?” I asked as I paid up.
Me: And I know that, I can see that everyday if I look hard enough. Just pop onto Google and look at the amazing stories and pictures people share. But in fantasy, all impossible things are possible. Nothing is unimaginable.
See that little wooden squirrel? Do you know what that's used for?
HTML
a handful of herb salad or any greens of your choice
“Paul, a servant of Jesus Christ, called to be an apostle, separated unto the gospel of God.”
An all-night garage.
She dances
3. фото коттеджей высокого разрешения
When it comes to fruit flies, bananas are your worst enemy, because in the supermarket, fruit flies preferentially lay eggs on bananas. When you bring your bananas home, the flies hatch, and you have a problem.
I have been surprised at how emotional this is getting for me. I really sense relief. I’m not quite sure yet how I really feel. Partly relieved, partly proud, partly sad at the cost and what I had to give up personally. And angry that in a couple of days, some people (who shall remain nameless) will see me as a professional because I have a stupid piece of paper. Even though I could have taught most of my “major” classes! I did it though, and I’ll be done and no one can take it away from me. I’ll be a professional, with 30 years of experience fresh out of school. No other new graduate can say that.”
At any rate, Stacey‘s performance was enough to send her home… but Astro certainly got it handed to him by the judges. A Tiger can’t change his stripes in a day, but hopefully he’ll learn a lesson or two after his behaviour last night.
Gisela would be a good candidate because her colors match Frites, and on the 5th turn she could be doing the MOST damage (1opts) while also halving all damage done to you which gives you more time to use Unburial Rites to get stuff into play. A 6th turn Elesh Norn would definitely end the game.
I'm feeling pretty good so far. I haven't had any negative reactions to the diet or introduction of foods. Yesterday I introduced Brussel sprouts into my soup. Today I'm trying to introduce a little homemade yogurt. I also made a large batch of soup so I won't have to spend time cooking and letting it cool. I'm hoping this feeds me all day. I'm actually thinking it'll be good for two meals.
I laughed so hard. We truly have the best therapist ever! Not only does she deal with E, she also cleans up, helps with meals, and sends out people to scout for elbow replacements for us. It just doesn't get better than that!
First things first. Emma Stone is a natural blonde. Further, Emma Stone is a Summer. That means everything about this ensemble is wrong for her (for glow purposes). She needs something lighter and cooler-toned. This dress is to “heavy” for her. Now, the overall picture is pleasing to our eyes because we are looking at the actual colors contrasting from her hair and the dress and that DOES provide a pleasing effect. However, if we look at her face (notice how you’re not drawn to her face, mainly the COLORS of her hair and dress), you can see that she looks way too pale and faded in this dress.
I will give it a 6/10. This is just an initial Consumer’s preview experience. I am expecting a lot more.
Agent Fresco
Today, while we will certainly miss daddy, we are also grateful for the job he and his fellow guardsmen are doing. You and I have also talked (well, I talked and you sort of listened) about the fact we are so lucky that we will get to see daddy in just six short days. There are so many military families who have to wait much longer than that to see their loved ones again. To them, you and I are indebted. We will pray for them each day and thank them every chance we can. To them we owe our freedom...
Mo's digital DP2 challenge and this is their 100th challenge and the theme is celebration and my card is to celebrate a new baby
The question is, what then? What do we put in place to make sure the same juggernaut won’t be revived the next time around?
1 undiscussed
Movies to Rent
No one plays piano.
THE PACIFIC TSUNAMI WARNING CENTER HAS CANCELLED THE REGIONAL
The use of the first person is dangerous for the offenders because it can be thrown back at them with a great deal of force, if the targeted person knows what is being done and are quick off the mark. Thus it is used while engaging the targeted person in some way as to blind sight them.
She said: ‘I would have wanted it to end differently. But God knows we’ve talked about that ending for five years now – we’re still talking about it.
"Socialism is the philosophy of failure, the creed of ignorance, and the gospel of envy."
- More Basketball at Tavern and Bender buying beer. Can get a KT Tunstall "A Whoo Hoo"! We were waiting for the Houston crews buddy to play. Then said band disappears to see the spectacle taking place next door at Waterloo Records, GOBLIN COCK! We have to check this shit out.
Kryptonite steel cable
Upon arrival in Prague, we loaded a floppy Lucien into the stroller and headed for the car rental place. We were thrilled with our larger-than-average Peugeot rental car and immediately broke the back door handle off in our excitement. The rental guy, whose English was previously pretty good, went speechless.
Drivin to erode the love that God looked down at us and throwed..
Robin Thicke's unlikely status as the only white guy in urban music who has virtually no pop crossover ("Sex Therapy" was an R&B chart-topper that scraped the Hot 100 at No. 100) makes his evolution from son of a sitcom star to soul music sex symbol kind of funny, but the truth is this guy is fucking talented, and 2008's Something Else remains one of my favorite R&B albums of the last few years. Love After War is a much longer and almost inevitably less consistent record, but it shares many of its strengths while showing that he still has some ideas up his sleeve, including a husky, almost raspy midrange that he sounds increasingly comfortable with after years of leaning a bit too hard on smooth falsetto.
who’s mentally handicapped
Scott Hamilton / Three Philosophical Defences / 50
Fasten your seat belts, everyone! It's Perfect Picture Book Friday! And if last week is anything to judge by we're in for quite a ride!
Marcelo: 3
As a child, William Wordsworth imagined he heard the moorlands breathing down his neck; he rowed in panic when he thought a cliff was pursuing him across moonlit water; and once, when he found himself on the hills east of Penrith Beacon, beside a gibbet where a murderer had been executed, the place and its associations were enough to send him fleeing in terror to the beacon summit.
In our city Trick-or-Treating isn't until Halloween Monday evening...but where I grew up, 42 minutes from here, it was tonight. So, I gathered up the boys' costumes, and headed back home for a few hours. It started off well; the mist was bearable. But by the time we got around the block, it was getting uncomfortable and the boys had enough.
It is a day of hospitality. During the week, of course I get to meet other moms for informal get-togethers at the playground, but overall we are all pulled into our separate routines. Shabbat means opening our doors to others for a leisurely Shabbat meal full of laughter, noise, fellowship and sharing. It also means inviting, sometimes on the spur of the moment, neighbours whom we don't normally see during the week. It means forging connections, building a real community of friends who can count on each other in times of need.
Saints knew victory over Coventry would send them up and, despite a nervous start, they were worthy winners. Sharp diverted Lallana’s volley past keeper Joe Murphy after 16 minutes, and when Fonte headed his first goal of the season three minutes later, victory was all but sealed with nearly 70 minutes left to play. Dutch defender Hooiveld drilled home from close range after the break, while Lallana’s tap-in was the cue for the St Mary’s party to get well and truly under way.
I knew if I laid there long enough, the grass would grow until it came within My reach. All I would need was patience, and it could all be mine. After waiting a full five minutes, I decided that patience wasn’t working, and I retired to My Indoor Domain and the waiting food bowl. Unlike the grass, the food bowl never mocks Me.
"Rue the Day" – 4:14 (bonus track)
I think Mum agreed with me about the meta-physical meaning of space, time and catnip, but wasn’t very happy that I’d got rather muddy discovering it.
On the side, where the suggested videos are, I saw something that literally made me catch my breath. Really? Someone had posted this?!!!!
2 cups grated Idaho potatoes
Hybrid and electric cars saw record U.S. sales in March as gas prices rose and new models hit the market. Here are the top 10 hybrid cars in March by sales.
I did get another Lily Sugar & Cream cloth knitted over the weekend too. This is the Bee Stitch pattern. It's really cool to look at. It was ok to do once I could read the knitting. You know how you have to recognise the look of the knitting you have done to pick where you are up to? It took an age. So lots of undoing as well. But it was a nice one. Really easy all in all!
“Of course,” my friend said, “when they get stuck or trapped or in one place, they just shit and…”
I admit to preferring the pounce, personally. I’m one of these laser-focused people who’s always doing something and hates being interrupted, whether cooking or reading or writing. Sex, romance, smooching — it all takes uninterrupted, undistracted time. And undivided attention.
You can use any knit knee highs. Cut off the curved parts and you'll end up with a long tube and a much shorter tube (the straight part from the foot)
Again we were stumped. All of our selections were either already on the list, or not within the repertoire of our musical trio. Being that my brother was a classical guitarist, and luckily in Buzios for the wedding, I called for his advice and asked him to meet me outside the church.
And then there are the very cool new wooden buttons I have acquired for the shop too. They are ultra sweet - smooth wooden buttons with a lovely floral pattern on them. I loved them the minute I saw them and could already picture them embellishing my cards.
I've spent a month teaching Swedish, rushing all over blogland meeting new people, answering a kabizillion emails, and I just realized I've left out a word I'd meant to teach. Don't quite know how this happened, but let's call this post here make-up work. Extra credit. I remember well how interested certain math students were right there at the end of the semester to get an extra boost to their grade. Never mind that had they just turned in more assignments, there would have been no need for any extra effort...But you might want extra credit –
I hate bad courier drivers. I had a parcel ‘delivered’ to my mailbox today. It was actually left on top of my mailbox, in plain sight of everyone – addressed to somewhere two streets away, and didn’t even have the same street number as me! The signature sticker had also been ripped out. The only conclusion I can draw from that is that some Fastway courier driver, lost or just plain couldn’t be fucked, decided to leave the parcel on top of a stranger’s mailbox, and pretend that it had delivered and signed for.
The bread sticks are so excited to be celebrating this special milestone in the life of ODBD! It is such a blessing to work for a company that brings glory to God in every stamp set created, and offers us the tools we need to do the same with every card we create! If you are a long term follower of ODBD, then you know that each year, the Design Team submits a favorite Scripture for the special anniversary sets, and those suggestions have been the sum total of all the "Scripture Collection" stamp sets in the store. This year, the special sets include our favorite Scriptures, but also quotes and sentiments that we feel would be great on cards or projects. I think you will find some of the most encouraging and uplifting words available in stamps in these special anniversary sets!
We decided to go with a saison yeast blend for this beer, which is the first time I have tried blending saison yeasts right off the bat. But both Paul and I have come up really frustrated with the Dupont yeast as a sole fermenter in the past, so this blend will be worth trying in a few beers. We decided to pitch both the "Dupont" strain and the "French Saison" strain, with twice as much Dupont yeast. The fermentation was started rather cool and ramped to 80 over a few days, a good compromise between the French strain which produces plenty of character at cooler temps, and the Dupont yeast which can't seem to finish out if it drops below 85 degrees. The French saison yeast will definitely help attenuate the beer faster when the Dupont yeast slows to a crawl in the last 1/3rd of fermentation.
The 11am art class went well, but I had to break up a cat fight at the beginning of class. (Sounds like I was teaching anatomy - from birds to cats.) Two of the girls were clawing at each other because one of them had moved her desk, which intruded on the other girl's space. Of course neither of them took responsibility. We went into the hall and because they wouldn't apologize, I made them write apology letters during class. By the end of the period, they were smiling and best friends again. They decorated and re-decorated their letters, showing them to each other intermittently, so that there really wasn't any need to force the exchange.
Grows well in zones 5 – 9 and will grow in a little shade for that spot in the garden that does not have full sun.
Mizuno running shoes are the perfect footwear for those who are planning to run or for those who love running, but of course you should also make sure that you have the right fitting for the type of feet you have. These shoes are made with the newest technology of shoe manufacturing. Mizuno’s lifetime dedication to research and development in the field of performance footwear has been manifested by the presence of a wide selection of technologies within its shoes.
Our friend, Shukri took some pretty amazing pictures. This one says it all.
So for this weeks posts I thought I would share the Birthday cards I created.
Go Pro Hero: I would also like to use a Go Pro Hero camera as they can be mounted pretty much anywhere on the bikes, they can also be worn by the riders giving interesting shots and points of view. My lecturer Bill Bell has one of these, however I have also found out that one of the riders from today has the same camera and he is also willing for me to use it when he is riding. Here is some of the footage he has shot prior to the documentary being made:
Nearly 3 years ago my life changed, completely! It means I don't have the freedom to drop everything and meet a bestie for coffee. It means that paying bills becomes a priority and having clean clothes and food on the table are essentials... sometimes Mummy has to the back seat.
Held up by standards wrought with fruited vines
For more information about the Sony DSC-T7 infos click here.
Are you tired of watching the same,old,boring, cheesy, Bollywood or Hollywood romantic comedies or chick flicks? Do you absolutely scorn those ridiculous lovey-dovey songs that do nothing to take the plot forward? Or scoff at the, lets face it, stupidity of such films?
I'm sending this card to Operation Write Home (where the theme is "Miss You"), and I left it without a sentiment because I think it could be used by one of our terrific military guys or gals for any of several reasons; Missing You, Love You, Thinking of You, Wish We Were Together... OWH sends donated, handmade cards to our troops overseas so they can use them to write home to loved ones. You can read more about them by clicking on their badge on the sidebar of my blog.
querulous mouths back demanding
“Well that was very French,” I said as we drove down the hill back to Tarascon.
Mile 21 - 11:57
Let’s be plain. The role model for this “privatization” (of social security) was the selling off of Russian state assets after the fall of communism, in which the shares distributed to each Russian citizen soon were snapped up by a few dozen savvy insiders who became today’s famous Moscow Oligarchs. Some of the richest plutocrats in the world arose from insider manipulation of the unwisely executed privatization of state assets... and NOT the creative-competitive delivery of innovative goods and services. If you call such monopolist-moguls "capitalists" who deserve their vast lucre, then you add to the spinning in Adam Smith's grave.
This woman was possibly autistic, herself.
“Why do this to yourself, again? Michael…Chances are you are just going to fail again. And then, you are going to feel bad. Just say ‘to hell’ with this project. Honestly, it was never all that realistic, anyway.” Originally, the words didn’t bother me. Not one little bit. In fact, if I am being totally honest, I was able to justify my mother’s skepticism, toward the successful completion of this project. As much as I may hate to admit it, I am weak-willed. My weak will has been the demise of this project, two times already. Therefore, I couldn’t really blame her, for have little (or no) faith, in my ability to meet the end of this project, with success.
Fleur de sel or Kosher salt, for sprinkling
I can’t even begin to write down everything I’ve delved on after endlessly researching astrophysics and Neil’s speeches in general. But I hope this video has the same effect on you.
Drawer 5: This drawer houses the things that will soon become frankens. It also holds the polishes I am collecting for swaps but I took them out of the photo so my current swap partner won't see them! (Hi, Tinka!)
40g Ground Hazelnuts
To me there's no more evocative sound. This little video is from a DVD by Priory Records which they’ve put on youtube just for this blog, because the kind producer happens to be my long-suffering husband. It’s an organ performance of the Dambusters March, but watch what happens halfway through as the last working Lancaster in England flies in the sky above Lincoln Cathedral. The music is wonderful, of course, but as it dies my husband kept the sound going so we could hear the wonderful and unique sound of those four Merlin engines that say ‘World War II’ in a way nothing else can.
It is in this final chapter that McKnight sketches, all in one place, what he regards as the full scope of the gospel narrative. Listen, this book is worth purchasing for these five pages. Dr. McKnight rather adeptly takes the Jesus story all the way back to creation, follows it through the formation of Israel, the exile and return, and lands with Jesus’ own life and what it means for the whole of humanity and the world. My jaw dropped at this brilliant summation of the scriptures.
But other than the show itself, the highlight of the evening was the couple we sat with. At this venue, Rams Head Tavern, you are seated at tables and unless you buy all the seats at your table you share with someone else, and it is always such a treat to find out what kind of wingnut you're going to be sharing your evening with. I love going to Rams Head because it's small, and even if you get a bad seat you still have a fairly good view of the stage, and you can eat and drink during the performance. You just have to be prepared to have your tablemates tell you about every single time they have seen the featured artist perform and how they have a shrine in their backyard shed and how they are going to find a way to have sex with and/or marry the aforementioned artist if they have to kill every person in the room to do it. It's even better if they are the sort who like to get up and shake their moneymaker during the peppy numbers.
She did a decent job with me.
Citizens Against Government Waste is the nation’s largest nonpartisan, nonprofit organization dedicated to eliminating waste, fraud, abuse, and mismanagement in government. Porker of the Year is a dubious honor given to a lawmaker, government official, or political candidate who has shown the most blatant disregard for the interests of taxpayers throughout the year.
I rode my sweet mare today and we had a fabulous ride. I swear I could lope her for hours and never get tired of it!
However, time stands still for no one. There’s ”no app for that”. The future is uncertain and will inevitably be here before we know it. I was amazed at how fast the past three weeks have flown by. Assuming that this pregancy goes to term (which we have been given no guarantee), that gives us about twelve weeks to go — twelve weeks that will fly by at an equal speed. Past that point the deadly waves crash and roar in the distance. I can’t let my eyes stay focused on them because I know that God will put them into proper perspective once they are upon us. He will not allow them to take us under.
Where is all this stemming from you might ask? I am not sure, but I feel like the world is throwing bricks at me hoping I will wake up enough to catch one rather than just standing around dodging them so that I won't get hit. So sorry if you happen to be standing behind me and it got you, but hey, I have my own family to look after. I will admit, I have been way too informed these last few days with being sick. One story in particular has not been able to escape my attention.
It made me realise that staying in this job – despite my knowing that Baclofen is suppressing my motivation to drink – is going to get me down. I’m always going to be seen as the emotionally damaged, self-destructive, alcoholic and someone to laugh at.
This January 2012 has brought home organizing and financial goals/priority-setting to my attention.
29/3/2011 I installed Seesmic Desktop 2 on my Windows 7 computer and it took all of 2 minutes. Windows installed most of the common apps and plug ins so I was up and running on Twitter in record time. I really like Seesmic Desktop 2. The interface is great, the ease of use is exemplary and it is just a really helpful piece of software. My next challenge is to get it onto my iPod Touch.
Like I said, I find this hypocrisy too hard to bear at times.
Please stop by this Sunday to see what other items I have made to go with my Snowman Soup project!!!
DAMIEN: Do you have the picture?
I have to admit, I more or less assumed this would be the one aspect of Obama’s presidency the right would be inclined to ignore. After all, Ronald Reagan took 436 days during his two terms, setting an all-time record. Facing 9.5% unemployment, Reagan took off for a month-long break, which included a period in which the president’s aides stopped relaying news to the Republican president so as to not interrupt his sojourn.
Poor hygiene and sanitation have caused numerous disease outbreaks in Zimbabwe in recent years.
"Mom, can I have a hot rod airplane?"
of its controversial sweetener,
(b) no food or refreshment is served;
Can you see why this is a tough decision? So no, I’m not going to make any rash decisions. I owe it to myself to not do that. Because if you’re anything like me, you know that after you end a relationship, it’s easy to second guess all the decisions you’ve ever made. It’s easy to see all the ways you were intolerant of someone else’s flaws. It’s easy to blame yourself for throwing away a perfectly good relationship. What I want to do is explore all the possibilities, try all the ways I can, collect data (hello, I’m an engineer), and understand how I feel. That way I know that in the wee hours of the night when “The Voice” tells me how stupid I was and how much being alone sucks, I can whisper back that I made the right decision and that time heals all wounds.
This is how we pretty much sleep every night. I guess my husband took an early morning photo of me & Zoey still sleeping. We actually have a king size bed but I just happen to see that I am ALWAYS pushed to the very edge of the bed because my little cuddle bug gets smack in the middle (or should I say on my side of the bed)....LOL just like a person.....body under the covers and head out! She usually starts out the night all the way under the covers pushed up against me or my husdands side.
If, for some reason, one or both parties wishes to separate the know-how licence from the patent licence, the know-how paragraphs can be pulled out and embodied in a separate agreement. In such cases the know-how agreement should stipulate the pertinent terms and conditions from the patent licence that will also apply to know-how.
1 T rosemary
The truth is that God doesn’t need all the attention and hubbub a display a healing like that would produce to get the results He wants. I think He’s benevolent and chooses instead to use us instead to carry out His plans, to be His hands and His feet.
so irrepressibly that her narcissi cringe,
HVSTG Blog (hvstgblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Then comes the crucial part about the certificate eventually.
Enter John Cena.
Party Dolls and Wine by Eddie Spaghetti
In the modern world banks do not lend cash. A businesswoman takes a $10,000 loan and agrees to repay $11,000 in a year. The bank creates $10,000 in checking account money. This adds $10,000 to the money supply. One year later if she does not renew the loan, she pays the bank $11,000. Please note that the bank pockets $1,000 in interest to their profits. But the $10,000 principal vanishes and reduces the total money supply by that amount.
I can't wait to drive to the Weggymans and try this dope device out. I may even buy a viddie-cam to share the moment with you. Won't that be fun!
Tip: Must try the French classics like steak tartare and creme brulee.
3. Add the garlic, tomato paste, and red pepper flakes and cook an additional minute.
Early last week, our Associate Pastor (and my friend) called to ask if I would participate in the Scripture readings in the Good Friday Tenebrae service. *gulp*
Meal planning really helps because it makes me eat properly. With my husband working late it is easy to just grab something quickly once the kids have gone to bed, and it is not usually something healthy. So the meal plans really do help to keep me focussed on more sensible eating.
We are so sure that you will receive valuable deliverables during our workshop, we are offering you a free 60-90 minute coaching session valued at $375.00, in addition to the seminar.
So, this person asked the following question: "Why do you set your films up to get the audience worked up, make it tense, believable and engaging, and then suddenly ruin it?".
While all true, Cloud delivery has three distinct characteristics which help to identify and to define itself:
In 1996 Irish director Neil Jordan detailed the fallen hero’s life, in Michael Collins, which stars Liam Neeson. It is a film that captured her imagination.
Taking this even further, a story can have pictures and music too, becoming an “app” rather than an e-book. Eventually, taken far enough down this route, it will become a game and no longer be a book.
Gift Bags
God bless Mucinex!
The lady, surely the domina of the house, sits down nobly on the wooden throne. It is the deep of the night. The grove is lit only by the torches and by the rays of the full moon now high in the sky.
Kathryn Ptacek – Butternut And Blood
The original quote referred to wine and went something like:
Here I Am!
Tolling for the outcast, burnin’ constantly at stake
9:42 - 10:32: Art, there's a substitute teacher.
It had been a long and stressful day, and after hanging out with the boys at the wine shop I couldn’t wait to get home and hit the sac. With that, I got into my car, inserted linkin park’s Meteora cd off I was.
My closet is full of shoes I have worn in shows. Sadly, the go-go boots and Tweety Bird hi-tops have worn through and gone to the trash heap, but I still have the yellow patent Blanche DuBois T-straps, Elmire’s red satin mules, and the combat-style boots I wore in as Neasa in Quotidian’s Shining City last fall. So I was not surprised when, even before the first rehearsal, our costume designer Stephanie Mumford emailed me a photograph of the shoes I will wear as Agnes, the character I am playing in Dancing at Lughnasa.
One thing is for sure: I'm a new die hard Phantom fan!
How ironic that I currently have far more respect for my former prosecutor and his proposed legislation than I have for those activists who would foolishly and dangerously oppose this great step forward over trivialities, much the same way as done by many so-called members of the movement who killed Prop. 19 in California in 2010. Much of the Washington state opposition to I-502 is rooted in adversarial jealousy, because after three attempts, some activists just can’t get an initiative of their own on the ballot, so resent McKay, the ACLU and their backers who did manage to get I-502 on the ballot.
You wouldn't have lonely.
Just read an article about these new futuristic glasses which google are developing. According to the article in the NY Times, “the glasses can stream information to the lenses and allow the wearer to send and receive messages through voice commands.”
Hope you all had a lovely Easter weekend and the weather was better than we had here, rain and cold and more rain :-( Still I didn't go anywhere so it didn't really matter!
Dark K. Britain and the end of the Roman empire. Tempus 2002, ISBN 0-7524-2532-3.
The winner of the Digistamp Boutique prize is:
washes earth clean
And the State vs Cheryl Miller has added a new lawyer to the State’s side….Fuad like he get vex with Vashiest Maharaj and went and hire Devesh Maharaj and Russell Martineau with Silk!
The pea-green boat is ready to sail, along with 2 bows, 2 flowers, 2 frames, 2 ribbons, 1 air balloon, 1 bird, 1 bong tree, 1 branches, 1 butterfly net, 1 clawed heart, 1 diamond rain, 1 full moon, 1 guitar, 1 hearts together, 1 island, 1 ladder, 1 lightning bug, 1 lights, 1 moonlight, 1 mushrooms, 1 musical notes, 1 owl, 1 paper boat, 1 paper cloud, 1 paper flyer, 1 pussycat, 1 pussy willows, 1 rings, 1 snail, 1 sparkles, 1 stars, 1 tag, 1 top hat, 1 water border, and 1 wedding veil.
Ambie and her friends were going to stage a big demonstration on April 28, this time involving thousands of people from the kingdom. They chose the marketplace, and they sought for permission from the house of the lords, but could obtain none. One of the lords even jeered: “Ambie, do you want to use the coliseum? We offer that to you, but you have to apply to the lord of the Coliseum.”
Why do I hate it so much? Is it the cutesy-ness, the way it has wee Lindsay playing twins, differentiated by accent rather than any discernable human quality? Is it the stereotype of England it pushes complete with creepy butler who - excuse me while I vomit - has a clap hands and dance routine that he performs with the little Lohan muppet?
White South Africans should learn from their own history and realise that their leaders have always been their worse enemies. Their leaders are idealistic dreamers leading their followers into an ocean of fire, a hell they cannot even begin to imagine.
And that would be one of the few times a sexual relationship happens in the novel. Though for Carly it held weight because she thinks this later while gazing upon her lover:
Closed four years ago after only attracting 3800 visitors a year, the Musée Jean-Jacques Henner has been renovated, with the hope of now attracting upwards of 50000 visitors annually. The reopening takes place this weekend and will be your chance to rediscover this interesting 19th century artist’s residence. Henner was a very fashionable portraitist in his lifetime, but quickly fell out of fashion after his death. It was his niece who acquired this house, previously the studio of the artist Guillaume Dubufe (who painted the ceilings in the Train Bleu restaurant in the Gare de Lyon), in order to display her uncle’s work. She donated the residence to the state on the condition that they open it up as a museum. Although the artist’s work is not especially original, the house, particularly after this renovation which has sought to take it back to its original state, is certainly worthy of a visit.
For anyone still “on the fence” about weather modification / manipulation :
HOME OR THEATER: The outer space vistas of Oa need to be seen on a big screen.
JW: I’m not sure, but listening to all the great radio hits and almost-hits from the sixties made me appreciate a good three-minute song. Roger Miller’s “King of the Road” just seemed like a great tune when I first heard it. Once I got into the history of Rock music, it didn’t take long to have to run down all their influences from Blues, Country and R n’ B. The history of pop music and how it quickly evolved through the years just seemed like something important to check out. It was still reasonably new; in ’74, Elvis had only been around for about 20 years. Pop Rock music was being created by our extended peer group, for our enjoyment. The Rock community still existed in the mid-seventies, though corporate big money was already changing things.
Spray a 9 x 13 pan with cooking spray and pour vegetable mixture, with all liquid, in pan. Roll pie crust to roughly a 10 x 14 rectangle. Top with pie crust and fold down the edges. Bake at 350 F for 55 minutes or until crust is golden brown.
very very volatile correctly set a buy at approx 95.60 when it was 98 but didn't give it enough breathing and it fell through to 93.48 so it needs 250 as room?
Now in Texas we have
The only problem is that you have to do them one by one, and that is not always an option. As for waiting for the oven to come up to 250ºC, only for fifteen minutes? In Scotland, maybe, but anywhere that´s hot that´s suicidal.
We bravo and beam.
Not become faded
The canning DVD made we want my own outdoor kitchen. I have caught the canning bug and last year I probably canned about 100 jars of assorted jams and jellies! I don't think I will need any this year! I recently received a pressure canner and am looking forward to canning much of our garden produce this summer. In fact, this afternoon a friend and I are going to start canning some of that abundance of milk we have been receiving! I am so excited to get started!
I haven't technically started this one yet, but I'm putting it here. I've picked the pattern, pulled the fabrics and it's taking up room in my crammed project box, so I'm counting it! It will be donated through the MSP Quilting Angels group.
the air he propels around me
Bad move, Newtiacs!
1 pulled
Water for Elephants: Directed by Francis Lawrence; Starring Robert Pattinson, Reese Witherspoon, Christopher Waltz
* I am also thankful for the beauty of autumn and the fun of carving pumpkins.
PTI White, light blue textured cs, Designer Paper is from my stash (sorry no cover, so I don't know the name of it)
Y11 Spanish – Foundation Monday 12:30 ML4
Bonnie
Sir Walter Scott – The Tapestried Chamber
Double-Click on each image, to make it larger.. double click and save to your hard disk or print it out.. each page has been written in A4
It is likely that after this week, I will not be able to post for a while, so please contact the Chief for questions, unless it is necessary to get me. That is all.
I've never been to Vegas, and Matt hasn't been since he was a young single dude. Our hotel is already booked, but we're a bit clueless about what we want to do in Vegas, particularly because there are so many things to choose from! So for those of you who've been, I would be forever grateful for your insider tips, recommendations, and favorites. Whether it's your favorite show, your favorite restaurant, or your favorite spot to grab a drink, please share! If you've ever tried getting discount show tickets or booking ahead with a great website, I'd love to hear. Big or small, fancy or casual, we're up for anything.
Gah - 've just realised. This means I should spend my day doing maths and chemistry and physics.... Noooooo!
"Is there anyone taking this table?"
What better way to celebrate the first day of Spring then to attend the Sobo Style Spring Arts Market.
Initially, I was excited to spend less money on gas and focus more on getting ready for bikini season…should it ever come. Interestingly, I have noticed that walking more before my shift gets me more energized and I become more productive in the first thirty minutes of my shift that I usually spent catching up with co-workers. This was an effect that I had not anticipated, though it is beneficial for my work ethics.
On Friday 9 December we were busy preparing the Red Carpet Event. There were many things to be taken care of: PA system, projector, lights, photo exhibition, tent for 100 people, tables, chairs, red carpet, decoration, press releases, signs, stands, gift bags, cocktails, drinks, rehearsals, security, parking etc.
The article offers nothing terribly new, but it’s so well synthesized that it will make you feel like it does. Reading it again, I’m also struck by the fact that I ought to read Eating the Sun as soon as humanly possible. Has anyone here had a chance to read it?
This ends the first edition of Royals monthly, thanks for reading and I hope you enjoy even if your not a fan of the team.
1 package (or can) of salmon, drained
Art is more than an object. It is the essence of humanity. It is the way we express life; the way we live not just ‘after Shadbolt’ as some of my paintings do but essentially after the Creator of all. It is in our DNA to create and to enjoy creation. It can transport us spiritually. The materialism and consumerism in our culture would pale in comparison to the fire for art that has been burning in the hearts of people down through the centuries from the Medici to the Fauvists.
If we go by media reports, including impartial and august bodies like the BBC, the search for a better economic future ranks pretty high. Just in London, more than 113,000 Latinamericans (spearheaded by Brazilians, Colombians and Ecuadorians) reside. Nationwide the figure is roughly 186,000, according to research by Queen Mary University and the NGOs Latin American Women's Rights service and Trust for London. It'd be very interesting to know how the researchers worked out these numbers when there are still so many Latin men and women living illegally in the British isles and a "Latin" category is yet to be created in the census that is carried out every ten years in the UK. In fact, Spanish-speaking immigrants "of a darker blue" who originate from the Caribbean have to content themselves with the box marked "African-Caribbean". Provided I have enough space, I usually write "Hispanic-Chinese-Afro-Latin".
It really is unusual how an act of haste will bring decrease a total connection, which you both received built through a great number of days and nights with a great deal adore and health care. Even before you get an opportunity, you might be remaining inside of a deep gap of solitude, and major depression. Everything appears so clear, devoid of your ladylove. days and nights just lug combined and nights under no circumstances usually conclude. This is the situation of highest possible fellas once they have confronted a break up.
To her with a natural approach to anything in my life, she pretty much laughs in my face. That simple act manages to really discourage me pretty easily. I think, of the facts are there, the facts are there. If it makes me feel good, and is NOT dangerous, they why not? I don't think "because my mom says so" is a good enough excuse as an adult to do or NOT do anything.
We’re hitting the part of the year when everything HAS to fall in place. If it doesn’t then we screw everything up. Grades need to be ready soon. Testing starts back up next week. I have to do inventory for the lab supplies. And I’m certain there are going to be meetings out of the Wazoo. (For those of you who don’t know, the Wazoo is a small and secretive hut used by teachers to have very cramped and pointless meetings. It is usually found behind the cafeteria dumpsters.)
"On the West Coast, you’re looking at 29,000 acres of hops. In New York, it’s 50 acres," Miller added. "Less than 10 acres are in Madison County" -- once a nationally recognized hop center.
Within the loop we begin by setting the ‘value’ attribute for the option. As you can see we create one option for each state in our array ($states). The value is what will be sent to the server should the form be submitted. In our example we are setting it to the array member’s key which would be a value from 0 – 49 (see StateAbbr Class). Next we compare the $key to the variable we set earlier $st. If they are equal we add the attribute ‘selected’ to the option element and set its value to “selected”. This is then the state abbreviation that will be displayed in the component when the page loads. Finally we set the text for the element in the array, between the option tags (i.e., AL – WY).
In the afternoon, I was able to get quite a bit planned with one of my teammates. We are beginning to use C-SCOPE even though we are not required to yet because we do not have a real scope and sequence to follow. I know, it is crazy and I am still trying to wrap my mind around it. I think a big reason for this is because the Reading and Writing scores on the state test have never been the problem for my district. One year it is math, the next science, and then social studies. We know that we are going to be using C-SCOPE in the next three years so my thinking is that we might as well get used to it. I personally do not think the LA portion of it is that bad, but maybe it is just me.
With the Phillies organization suffering a home run power outage from top to bottom, the quickest way for any player to move up the organization would be to hit some long balls. Remember more than chicks dig the long ball!.
When Richard Dawkins talks about evolution, I listen, that is his expertise, however when he talks about feminism or women's issues, I have to take a step back, as that isn't what he is known for. I can't defend him as being a know it all for all things. It doesn't mean I don't respect the guy, but I'm not going to go to him as an expert on ALL things. Does that make me a hater of Dawkins? I also don't understand the need to demonize and start stereotyping black people because now you've seen a story you didn't like about Dawkins. I don't think Richard Dawkins is a racist. I don't think he has ever advocated racism, and I don't think he should atone for the sins of his ancestors, but I also don't think dismissing the struggles of black people the world over and how slavery, colonialism, apartheid, and segregation have impacted black people will do any good to progress the atheist movement or prove that an irrelevant article about Dawkins ancestry should even be defended. It should be mocked.
I am not a ‘cuddler’ and I never have been. But now that I’m married, and I’m sure a lot of husbands can relate, I’m becoming one by default. One thing that I’m learning, though, is that a good cuddle is a great warm-up for sex…
I love Paris in the springtime.
“Go bury this, Stevon. I can’t stand looking at it anymore.” said Jetrune, as he handed the Platinum Sword of Dragonsbane to the groomsman.
How did I miss out on this album for so long? According to Wikipedia, "The album itself spent 290 weeks in the UK album charts. It was in the top 10 in 22 countries and reached #1 in 11 countries." Is it because I'm a Yank?
I was not a parent. I was young and sadly enough, newly single as a troubled marriage unwound. This ministry became glue that would hold me together as I weathered personal storms that could have broken my spirit. God knew. He knew what I would need just as much as He knew what the children would need, and so we had FUN! Lots of it, camps, zip lines, ski trips, low ropes, high ropes, devotionals, fellowship, progressive dinners, rafting, retreats and every now and again the joyful, undignified dance in the rain...the list is long and beautifully filled with memories that prayerfully remain not only with me but with each child I was blessed to know.
A little searching led me to an open source project called USB Sniffer for Windows, otherwise apparently known as SnoopyPro. http://sourceforge.net/projects/usbsnoop/. Alternative options for future projects, happily received... especially if Tektronix want to give me an analyser to write about ;-)
“I don’t need it…” Debated one woman inspecting a vintage dress, longing in her eyes.
I have been following the lobby groups and online petitions and letters to anybody who cares in the lead up to the sale and was fascinated by the loyalty shown to the brand. And the angst in the weeks since the sale shows just how parochial some drinkers can be about ‘their brew’ and how immune to the realities of business they can be at the same time.
105.
Olives (chopped)
“I told you guys to watch the choppers,” Pitcher yelled as he clipped the last link in the fence opening a hole large enough for himself and his men to slip through.
Alphonse Constant Reyrolle(1864-1919)Manufacturer Of Electrical Engineering Equipment
After I got this message I realized how this incredible ride I am on is just the beginning - Ladies and Gentlemen, we are just about to pull out of the gate...HOLD ON, it's going to be a crazy ride!
Prep work that morning: Thaw English Muffins. Cook lentils and prepare sloppy joe mix
From the time we were small we have been told the story of the devil/shiatan/satan. Of how he disobeyed Allah and promised to depath the mankind in every possible way. My depiction for a long time of these possible ways were small. I never imagined the devil having much knowledge. To me devil was always the little red guy with horns over my left shoulder telling me to lie, miss a prayer, hurt someone and all the things we these days NORMALLY do and dont THINK about much. We alwasy know someone who is worse than us and thats makes it alright.
The backing band on the album is phenomenal, and I have to give a lot of credit to the label for signing Mr. Bradley, and really getting behind him. This is a soul album. It's not R&B, and it doesn't make any references to hip-hop. Which makes it a tough sell in 2011 and 2012. If you put some of these songs on a playlist of Stax songs from the '60s, they would fit in. It's not just the sound, it's the songs. If you love soul music, check this album out.
2. Heat a knitting needle or metal tube in the oven on a low temperature. The smaller the doll's head, the narrower the needles. If you want Shirley Temple sausage curls, use thicker ones.
This week's prompt is quite fitting: after all it is spring. And spring it is over here in Norway. I am staying on the top (or near the top anyway) of Lifjell (in the Telemark province) which rises to little under 1300 meters. And there is snow here. It snowed when I arrived, it snowed when I took this photo last Monday. Two kilometers down the mountain and the snow is hardly there anymore though and another two means you will only see it on top of the mountain!
To answer the question on Pakistan, which I’m not too sure was answered. The bottom line is, that we should be establishing relationships in Pakistan with allies of ours, folks like relationships with President Musharraf who we had in the past with others in that country so if in fact something like that would occur we could work in concert to make sure that that coup could be overturned and make sure those nuclear weapon do not fall in those hands.
And whispers through back alleys on brisk, December days
“She didn't see him at first. She was watching the dancers. Her color was high, and there were deep dimples at the corners of her mouth. She looked nine miles out of place, but he had never loved her more. This was Willa on the edge of a smile.” (from Willa)
Foo Fighters – The Best of You
She is up to 6 oz. now of formula every 3-4 hours. We are trying an experiment with Alimentum to see if that helps with any of her symptoms.
We had a 5 week Easter break after Lent term during which I stayed in London and essentially did nothing but exam preparation. I went back through all of my notes and readings and condensed a year’s worth of material into 39 pages of Psychology notes, 13 pages of Anthropology notes, 13 pages of Accounting practice problems, and 15 pages of Economics practice problems. To be fair I think I may have gotten through the hardest part of exam revision already.
On waking up at 7am, I discovered that neighbours in campgrounds are friendly people.
Canada Goose 10
Introduction: I have been friends online with a woman from Australia, on and off again, due to various circumstances in our lives since 2002. She is one of my very best friends, and she probably knows me better, on a more deeply personal level than almost all of my “real life” friends do.
After 3 long weeks of daily shots it all came to an end yesterday at the retrieval. I am so proud of myself and my family and friends for supporting me in this long journey. Although, the journey isn't over yet, I am still amazed at how far we've come.
According to §46(1) of of the German Patent Act, the Examining Division of the German PTO (DPMA) has to grant a request for oral proceedings provided that the latter is relevant to the case ("sachdienlich").
The questions can range from simple, like “when is your anniversary” or “what was your first date” to scandalous, like “what’s the wildest place you’ve had sex.” I try to tailor it to the couple and always encourage the guy to throw in a few of his own (these can be some of the funniest because the guys get so specific).
In a parallel universe where note-taking is recognized as a highly refined and specialized skill, I believe I am a professional note-taker who gets paid executive sums of money to take high-quality notes. I would be a contractor, meeting clients who need someone who can accurately capture what they actually mean vs. simply what they literally said.
I love the blessed Savior’s name,
But you dig in anyway.
I Love You Always Forever Donna Lewis
Thank you Ms. McCulley for the daily testing of your blouses thread count
Based on the long selling books from George R.R. Martin, this was definitely the first time HBO have done something quite overtly on the end of the fantasy scale and it easily could’ve been a misfire for them. Thankfully with a great budget, shooting the series in four different countries and some incredible storytelling, this can easily be seen as one of the greatest shows to emerge in the last decade.
The Struth is a photograph, one of a long series of photographs based on long-exposures of families so there is, naturally, a little strain in the faces and poses. But look how populous this family is, how comfortably ensconced in their room, and how they confront us. It is as if they were behind thick glass. 1989 signalled the end of history according to Francis Fukuyama, and this 1989 is a momentary dead end in the Smith family's history. It is the opposite of the first two images: it is family as armour and bastion and tribe. Each member of the family is fully mortal and sensate in himself or herself but put them together and they are a unit that has been arrested at a peak of power. The photograph is an embodied idea of what families might become. They have, as the poem puts it, made it as far as the room in which they sit. Nor is that a negligible achievement, in fact it's a great deal because, having been photographed there, they will remain there, invulnerable as image whatever happens in life. They look out at us rather than the other way round. Their gaze is the stronger. In that respect they are like those Byzantine wall paintings whose figures stare out at us reminding us we are not there as connoisseurs to appraise their aesthetic value or judge their merit as images, but as potent forces in judgment over us. They are conjurations, not art. I am still not sure of the Fukuyama reference, however it fits (and it does fit), because it is almost a pun, and it might not be that kind of pun that is required.
On a side note, I find it crazy that it is illegal to sell silver dragees in California! Yet, you can buy them in every other state in the country. Online stores that sell silver dragees won't even ship to you if you are in California. Because of this, the only silver dragees that I have are the ones my husband bought for me while visiting his parents in Hawaii last year.
* Your ring-tone on your cell phone is an elk bugle
We run up and down the highway of life, mixing high-tone with high-jinks resulting in hi-larity. We've been known to share the low-down on hidy-holes, steer clear of a few low-lifes along the way and keep it low-key if censors or children are around.
The other decision, circumcision. I really talked to my husband about this decision and left it up to him. Again, I knew both sides of the argument. However, one thing I also knew, is how a uncircumcised male felt. Not Hubby, but a high school boyfriend. Even though we did not engage in sexual activity, he once confided in me that his parents had not circumcised him. He explained how he was embarrassed by this, nervous for when he did engage in sexual activity, and much more. My husband had a point of view as the boy who was circumcised and as a 3rd grader, used the bathroom next to a boy who was not. He remembered the boy being embarrassed about it. In the end, we decided to circumcise our son. I know the argument that they can choose to have it done as an adult, but let us be honest- no man is going to purposely inflict that kind of "pain" on himself. Look how many are opposed to being sterilized because it makes them shudder. Also, the research on the amount of pain a baby feels, compares to an adult. I know, there is "research" on both sides...but I can now say from personal experience- my son only cried for a few moments, I nursed him, and he never cried after that. I also understand the effect it has for breastfeeding. This is why my son's circ was not done in the hospital, but a few weeks after his birth. That said, again, I understand the point of view of leaving a boy intact.
I have been switching up our devotional time a little bit lately, and it has been very good for us. The boy got a guitar for his birthday and he always wants to play it-all day long. I needed a safe daily time for him to play it, and we have a whole slew of kid instruments in the playroom. So I decided to play some jamming worship music and sing and let the kids play instruments for a praise section of devotions. In my house growing up, praise was always a cappella and I have always been voice conscious. This way the music is so loud no one can hear me sing. And we all just praise loudly, play instruments and dance. It helps the little guys get the wiggles out.
… so, I am waiting for the Orkin Man to come and rescue me. And then, packing a bag and staying with my parents until this issue is resolved.
By the way, that's one thing I love about clear stamps - I can bend them slightly to suit my design. It works perfectly when I'm stamping the sentiments in banners, and here I thought it would make the label look like taken from a seed packet.
Afterwards, when she asked us each what we thought, my only response was:
It felt good to get outside on a sunny day and get my hands dirty. I forgot what a workout gardening can be! I left tired, but it was good tired. Now I know where to go to get my green thumb fix in the City on Sunday afternoons.
Last week was United Nations week in NYC. President Clinton hosted the Clinton Global Initiative at the mid town Sheraton Hotel. There were 9 black SUVs with Maryland and DC license plates - a large van with no windows manned by armor vested men - a swarm of men in black suits, ear phones and lapel pins - an emergency medical van - 7 NYC police cars - 2 large NYC police vans with flashing lights at each end of the block - and a swarm of NYC police officers - all there to protect one man!!!
2) The mother should have monitored her child’s online activity.
Meanwhile, I sterilized my pint canning jars by heating them in a flat pan of water set on two stove eyes. I simmered my lids in water and kept everything hot until I was ready for them.
Percy is basically the guy who raised Billi. Arthur was too consumed by his bitterness and rage to have time for his daughter so it was Percy who remembered her birthdays, looked after her when she was sad or ill, remembered that she was more that just a soldier in the Bataille Tenebreuse.
“That’s the sentence of life imprisonment. Accordingly, I sentence you to life imprisonment.”
100g Chorizo
It was all over town by the next morning. It seemed everyone was talking about it. “There was a body found at the fire and it was little old Miss Jenkins found dead on the ground in front of the house, her hand still clutching her cell phone in her pocket like she had been trying to dial 911. She had been raped and killed between the hedge and the house, and the fire was set to try to cover it up.” They said. “She had always hated that little old house and the way it was left to decay. She wouldn’t even walk on the same side of the street as it.” The neighbors all agreed on that. “They had seen her every week coming home from the library to her house a few blocks away. Her house was kept in beautiful condition and her small front garden never had a weed. Such a shame, and a loss to the town now that she was gone.”
Another thing I love about sewing and sharing with all of you? It's so FUN! I had such a blast at the Crafters' Ceilidh meet-up--there was loads of laughter and sewing humour. I also love reading people's blog posts--they almost always make me smile!
Divorce feels like your heart and soul are being ripped apart. In a way, they are. You and your spouse have been one for the duration of the marriage, so it is like pulling away from a part of yourself. Finding a new balance on your own is hard, probably the hardest thing I have ever had to do so far. I am making some mistakes, but I know it will only get better as time goes on.
I still needed to find some way to vent some of the physical energy that was trying to burst out. Riding was for the time being out of the question. Swimming proved to be good. Interestingly, I could exert myself in the water and still breath. But the best thing was gardening. We’ve got a lovely big garden, full of mostly native plants. Over the last 18 months though, everything has grown tremendously, including the weeds. One day, Ophelia was out there pulling some of them up. I went out for some company, and before long I had started also. Four hours later we had amassed a huge pile. Well it was pretty big. More than that though, I noticed how good I felt when I was doing it. I wasn’t aware of any discomfort. It was great.
Think outside the box. For example, I'm going to be at an event at the Ada Community Library. This event will be by the Pixie Chicks' Writers (a group I belong to) and will be about An Eclectic Collage I and II, anthologies written by the Pixie Chicks. Instead of reading from my work, I'm going to demo the exercises from my article in An Eclectic Collage I.
Skewer a goat cheese ball onto the skewer. Lay a basil leaf on top a sun-dried tomato. Fold the tomato in half around the basil leaf and add to the skewer with the goat cheese. Repeat with remaining skewers. Arrange on a serving platter, cover and keep refrigerated until ready to serve
Another five miles and a hill later got us to Rodriguez campground. The evening entertainment was episode 1 of draining Peter’s blisters…which made a puddle of blood and fluid on the dirt where he poked them. Otherwise, we gathered around in a circle and chatted for a long time. Some stars were out, but not too many because the moon leaned toward full. I cowboy camped that night because I simply didn’t feel like setting up.
From Left: #01 Lady Rose, #07 Blossom Pink & #12 Peach Rose
Despite hours of hard labor during my 10 months in AmeriCorps, I don’t think I ever dropped below 200 lbs. The problem was the food. Our galley on campus had unlimited fried foods, breads, processed junk. Every meal ended with an ice cream sundae. I often felt sick after I ate, but never had the mental strength to change the way I was eating. At one point, while working in Alabama, my team decided we were going to eat healthy in the conventional wisdom way- lots of veggies (good), tons of whole grains (bad), lean meats (not the best), and several small meals throughout the day (not great). I felt constantly hungry and unsatisfied the entire time. All I wanted to do was eat and eat and eat everything in site. I didn’t have access to a scale at the time, so I don’t know if I lost any weight. My guess would be no since my clothes never seemed to fit any differently. My entire team was also afflicted with the worst gas ever. Our van smelled terrible and outsiders tried to stay as far away from us as possible. Not great.
I’ve reviewed Paul Watson’s Up Pohnpei for BornOffside. He was a freelance football journalist, working for Football Italia amongst others, when he decided to apply for the manager’s position at the small Micronesian nation of Pohnpei, where the organisation was roughly at Sunday League level.
I have had my life changed by a new person, whom I still look at and periodically marvel and the fact I managed to keep another human being alive for an entire year. Unbelievable.
On Wednesday, the day after the disaster, large swaths of the home page were blank, including a section featuring recent commercials. Inexplicably, however, what did remain was a smiling vice president for safety quoted as saying “we are proud of our tradition of developing safety innovations, which we freely share with … the entire industry.” (The entire industry’s response? Thanks, but no thanks). By Thursday, however, the artwork and commercials had returned, along with a click-through about “Careers at Massey” (again, no thanks) and a small box offering deepest condolences to the families who lost loved ones.
J. First aide kit
Braden’s hard work has taken him to the corners of Canada to test his path-finding and localization device on the rover. Sudbury, northern Labrador and Devon Island all have good terrain for testing the equipment, he says. One day, he hopes his machine will be Mars-ready.
It is no secret I am not a huge Jonas fan. The character has been trying to be another Daniel rather than come into his own. Aside from a running gag about his fondness for junk food, there has not been much offered up in the way of distinguishing his character. “Shadow Play” comes close. We finally see some real emotion in Jonas. He is conflicted over his status as a traitor even though he believes he did the moral ting. He also clearly has a strong bond with his old professor/mentor, enough of one he is willing to tell the man he is a hero rather than explain the tragedy that has most likely befallen his people by that point. It is very oving, and certainly more so because Stockwell is playing Kieran.
5t + 2.5t = 20
The modest amount and the local scale are vital to any such project. Right now, anyone with a fairly good set of hand tools and a good general knowledge of electricity, carpentry, and metalworking can build a wind turbine for a few hundred dollars. I can say this with some confidence because I helped do exactly that, for a good deal less, while at college in the early 1980s. The turbine itself was basically a two-blade propeller cut, shaped, and sanded from a block of fir; the conversion of rotary motion to electricity was done by an alternator salvaged from an old truck; the tail that kept it facing into the wind, the safety shutoff that swung it out of the path of the wind when the wind velocity got too high, and the tricky doodad that allowed it to turn freely while still getting electricity down to the batteries in the little shed at the base, were all fabricated out of scrap parts and sheet metal. We used a disused power pole to put the turbine up where the wind blew freely, but if that hadn’t been there, an octet truss tower – one of Bucky Fuller’s better designs – could easily have been put together out of readily available hardware and bolted onto a hand-poured concrete foundation.
AnGeleve.
The pin I had from pinterest did not have a link (it was just to google.com) so I hope I am not stealing anyone's original idea. If you were the first to think of the jello/fish, please tell me and I'll credit you:)
Don’t click on embedded links in advertisement e-mails. E-mails that appear to be advertisements from legitimate vendors could be a well-disguised scam or malware attack. Chances are you’ll be able to find the same deal by going directly to the website in your favorite web browser.
I’m not sorry it’s over
View of my Apartment Stairs from the Terrace. Thank you, Mr/Ms/Mrs unknown who took all the trouble to lit up our crappy building.
Speaking of which, from sleek sophisticated soul we emerge quickly and sharply enough to lead to a nasty case of the bends in the synesthesiac shape of a set of brightly coloured jackets, a honking sax and some comically boss-eyed bass vocal interjections. There's something very pinch mouthed about Dave Bartram's face when singing, isn't there?
This is also the chakra that gives us courage to fight for what we think is right, to defend ourselves, to say no when it is necessary, to set appropriate limits with others in all areas of our lives. By giving us this courage it is also the chakra that when balanced allows us to be at peace. “…it endows one with serenity, gentleness, and patience.” Pg 76
There's the rub! The novel and its supporters deny that Black people have been the central actors in their movements for liberation and justice, from widespread African resistance to, and revolts against, slavery and colonialism to the twentieth century's mass movements challenging segregation, discrimination and imperialism. . . . The novel portrays Blacks as somnolent, awaiting someone from outside to take up and fight for the cause of justice.
It’s a lot more technical to grasp and setup, but I chose Lightning Source for several reasons, but primarily for their business model. Lightning is part of the Ingram Book Company. Ingram are the largest book wholesale distributor IN THE WORLD and the preferred wholesale provider for more than 71,000 retail, online (like Amazon) and library customers globally. So your ‘self published’ books automatically travel through Lightning’s and Ingram’s system at no extra cost to you ready to be ordered on demand. Wow, that’s pretty awesome and should be enough to convince you.
As the warmer days of spring and summer approach, nothing hits the spot like a glass of ice tea or lemonade. I actually love to mix the two together because I find it gives a sweet and tart balance that is amazing. This time I decided to get creative and threw in some fresh strawberries for flavor and a gorgeous color to make this festive Strawberry-Lemon Iced Tea. As a Sri Lankan a good quality tea is a must have in any household. My favorite brand of tea is Aura brand of Ceylon Teas by Almar Teas. Aura makes strawberry and lemon flavored teas that are delicious. So I took a little help from them by using their flavored teas and enhancing it with some fresh lemon juice and strawberries. It may be hot outside, but with a refreshing glass of this tea, you can relax and actually feel good your are drinking something full of vitamins and antioxidant.
I'm trying to use what I have in the craft room instead of always
This Kat is once again in a bit of a panic. Having more or less come to terms with the copyright questions that confronted him in preparing the syllabus for his impending course here, he now has a new problem to deal with in class. Somewhere down the line, he will need to address what might constitute corporate patent strategy. Over the years, he has have developed a list of reasons why a company might build a patent portfolio, big or small. However, what has been happening during the last few years departs radically from the conventional reasons that explain patent activity by a company. How is he going to explain to students the massive patent acquisition deals that have captured the headlines in recent times?
Of course, Irwin did not need Serra to come to any conclusion about perception. He was doing exquisitely on his own out west. Unlike Serra, Irwin’s work does not focus on weight and mass, it is instead a play of soft hues in gentle transition, a sensitive attunement to how perception works. Ultimately, Irwin’s work is less austere than Newman or Serra, more comfortable, more about color and subtle gradations and mixing of light across the gallery. As Holland Cotter said, the installation feels “like a country teahouse, companionable, dimly lighted, very quiet even when busy, offering spirit-soothing visual fare in an overstimulated world.”
So, last night, I emailed my sister and asked her how far she would drive for a Girls’ Night Out. And I sent her a link to the activity. She lives about an hour and forty-five minutes drive away. She liked the idea, but said she would need my daughters to look after her youngest two (at my house) while we were out. And she asked if they could all sleep on our living room floor for the night. No problem.
His faithfulness continues through all generations."
This is stuff and nonsense that has no grounding whatsoever in the facts. Galloway won a 10,000 plus majority by convincing the electorate that he was a better Muslim, or rather a real Muslim, when compared with the favourite, Imran Hussein of Labour, who all previous political logic predicted to be a sure thing.
later that evening...
'Easy' said the Blonde (called Dorothy) , 'Andy sat, Andy watched, Andy waited till his billy boiled.'
Plus, her style is so cute, vintage and romantic. Not only her outfits are amazing, she usually sports a perfect vintage inspired hairstyle and make-up.
Because I need it too much. It's too important. And what happens if I finish that novel, finish those revisions, finish those queries and actually get what I want? What happens after happily ever after? 'Well,' I tell my idiot inner procrastinator, 'there will be more books you can write, book promotion to deal with, a whole host of crap you can't even dream of, basically a whole new world to explore. Get on with it.'
Halperin: Cain would probably have been the
10. Aeon
Coming as a twenty-five page, 9.55 Mb PDF, The Millionaire’s Special is short, sharp, and sweet. Released to coincide with the centenary of the Titanic’s tragic sinking, the proceeds from the sale of this very reasonably priced scenario go towards the charity, Heroes in the Dark, which creates audio comics to be enjoyed by the blind and sight-impaired. Nevertheless, the scenario does need a second edit and does have the feeling of having been rushed. To that end, it probably requires a little more careful handling by an experienced GM, especially during the scenario’s unstructured climax.
Read Hosea 10:9-15
Tiger Beat (still around! And still exactly the same!) and 16 Magazine were the kings of the teen idol scene, and they enjoyed the enthusiastic cooperation of the television and movie studios whose stars they so slavishly promoted. The stars themselves had no choice but to cooperate, and earned nothing but adulation in return. David Cassidy's C'mon Get Happy and Barry Williams' Growing Up Brady both contain vivid reminiscences about dealing with these aggressive remora-like publications, where honesty was discouraged and the writers routinely concocted fictions and fabricated quotes.
5. Autumn Rain
Books and Swag I Won:
You've used Tide laundry products for decades and you know you can trust Tide to get your laundry clean and smelling fresh.
Issues with the test seemed to resonate with many of the Supreme Court's nine justices during oral arguments in January.
Remove and cool completely before frosting.
Now, the one thing I did like about birthdays in our household was the fact that we also celebrated half birthdays with cupcakes instead of a cake. That was pretty cool. So, on May 9, when I turned 6 1/2, I got cupcakes. I loved that. I still note when my half birthday is each year, and buy myself some Hostess cupcakes as my little treat.
- Inbox grouped by user for easy searching
In sessions past we have worked our way through beers in a particular style, beers for a particular season or beers from a particular brewery.
We arrived at the Kalahari resort, where the UWWG was being held, on Monday the 2nd of February. That night, we were all really tired and spastic. Emi and I went down to the conference center, where everything was being held, for the Winter carnival, but we just felt out of place. I met a couple of people I knew from camp, but overall the carnival was really just for young kids, and all of the teens seemed to have come with their friends. I think we both, in our exhausted depression, decided that we'd have an awfuk time. Luckily, we were wrong!
This is Jessica's first card she has EVER made!! I am just so stinking proud of her and she did it all by herself! She worked on this while I worked on a special Valentine for my honey. :) Way to go, Jess!!
That’s not to say that I’ve not eaten a small amount of the stuff in the past 8 years. In fact, to go back to when I last actually ate some would take you a mere few weeks; my friends and I attended a viewing of “The Hunger Games” at the cinema (which I wrote about on here), and my friend offered me a milkybar button. There have been many instances of that, but none of me eating a sizeable quantity. So today, my friends, is the beginning of a new era, or the reawakening of an old one.
been hiding. I would
"Camaal just called me a flower."
A lot has happened since my last post.
To make the red layer, wash and cut up your strawberries. Combine strawberries, water and sugar in a sauce pan and cook until strawberries release their juices and become mushy and break up easily. Let cool slightly and pour this mixture into your Popsicle molds about 1/3 of the way up. Freeze
We are all familiar with a Herd of cows, a Flock of chickens, a School of fish and a Gaggle of geese.
Ladies, I am on cloud nine and I don’t even have an idea why. No, I am not pregnant with Rob’s lovechild. Even though I wish I were. Imagine how cute that baby would be (if Robs genes are as dominant as I hope them to be).
She is totally right, they are just like kids! Because as parents we make sure to love and guide our children in the best way possible. And there are moments when you see the results and you know your hard work is paying off.
Why am I not satisfied with my life? This is the question I attempt to answer everyday.
Meditation: Do you want to grow in holiness and be like Christ? Ezekiel prophesies that a “river of life” will flow from God’s throne in the Temple. This water will transform everything it touches, bringing life, healing, and restoration. Jesus offers himself as the source of this living water which he will pour out upon his disciples in the gift of the Holy Spirit. The signs and miracles which Jesus performed manifest the power and presence of God’s kingdom and they demonstrate the love and mercy God has for his people. In the pool at Bethzatha we see an individual’s helplessness overcome by God’s mercy and power. On this occasion Jesus singles out an incurable invalid, helpless and hopeless for almost forty years. He awakens hope when he puts a probing question to the man, “Do you really want to be healed?” And he then orders him to “get up and walk!”
Well, I don’t mind as long as there is no touching. And no, I’m not as nice as I look. As I was smiling and listening to his tries, my head was full of thoughts trying to “analyze” this guy, trying to learn as much as possible of another human being so that I by that can increase my knowledge and maybe use it in my writings.
“My leg’s bleeding,” you say, beginning to feel faint.
She pointed out that making generalized statements made people tend to stop listening to me.
The single was released in the UK on November 10 in CD single, 7" and 12" formats. In February 2008 the single began to gain traction on the US dance charts, peaking at #28 after five weeks on the chart.
It was a small consolation.
Here, I’m not primarily talking about pimping your work, although there’s absolutely nothing wrong with that in moderation - I never quite understand why people get so self-conscious about their “gratuitous plugs”. I certainly plug my How To Interview DoctorWho, Ozzy Osbourne And Everyone Else ebook on a regular basis (look out, I just did it again), while mindful not to become a spamaniac.
Maybe twice a month. Usually out to dinner once and lunch once. If Dave is just about to leave on deployment or training or just returning home, its more. If he’s gone, I literally never eat out.
This has been created to honour the 50th anniversary of Marilyn’s death in August 2012. The collection includes dresses, a uniform, bathing suit, showgirl costume and separates.
THE FOUNTAIN characters, in flesh and blood.
Then the song “Beautiful Exchange” arrived over my headphones. And The LORD, THE MIGHTY ONE made it clear to me that it was through the POWER of the CROSS. He showed me that although Adam walked with Him every day he was destined to fall away because Adam really was walking next to a God he did not know. He did not know Him because of two reasons…
Ghee or oil - 2 teaspoons
7 1/2 to 8 cups flour
I'm not worried about the way we are parenting Rudy in any aspect, just hope that the words I use, the terms I use, the way I state things - doesn't put him down in any way, but helps him.
It doesn’t go into important questions about raising children on your own, or separation within the family, or bereavement. These topics are too big and too specific for this kind of booklet, even though some of the ideas here should be helpful for people in these situations.
Until the management of the hotel sort this out, I am very sad to say that I most certainly do not recommend this venue to anyone.
Every year, after the Christmas decorations are put away, when it is cold and snowy and I’d rather be by the fire, when the sunshine beams in the windows brilliantly, I make a new jigsaw puzzle.
We might write books that aren’t classified as Christian fiction. We might write books peppered with language and activity that we don’t consider fitting for believers. But if those are the only people we touch, then aren’t we attempting to heal those who are not sick? And if that’s the case, then who’s tending to the ill?
Without fail, when I talk or post about the public school system and compulsory education among people I know who have children in the system or who plan on putting their children into the system those people tell me, "Our school is different/better/good," "I went to public school and I turned out fine," "What you are saying is really hurtful to teachers and the people who work so hard to make schools a wonderful place," "My kid loves school."
(If you say the Jersey Shore boys I may projectile vomit - they are not on this list for a reason - no offense. Except not no offense, because they are just so gross).
This verse contains a direct reference to Bhagavad-Gita: gītaṁ bhagavatā jñānaṁ.
We will be releasing more of this material, which has come into our hands and also be exposing the devastating effect on Sabah’s forests by greed-driven, unsustainable logging over the past few years. Insiders say that graft and greed in Yayasan Sabah has reached a whole new level since Musa Aman graduated from being its Chief Executive to the Head of State and Chairman of its Board of Trustees.
And high and far from a distant star,
First of all, this allergy season has been bad. Friday I caught myself wheezing in ways/tones I have never heard. Had to go to 3 different shops to finally find eye drops because the other stores were all sold out. But it wasnt bad - it was the one day in recent memory that was not windy, so that helped a lot.
I digress. This website will even give you meal ideas also to help you loose weight faster. I've only browsed through some of them, but I'm hoping in the next couple days to really go through them and see what it's all about. I seem to be in a pretty good rhythm with my workouts so I'd really like to start focusing on my diet. I've taken the steps to improve it, but I think I can do better. I seen a thing online that said being in shape and fitness is 30% exercise and 70 % diet!! I'm hoping to develop a personal challenge for myself through dieting and see how it goes. Now when I say "diet" don't think I'm going all granola and yogurt on you or no meats, etc. That will probably never happen because I've mentioned in earlier posts, I'm a meat and potatoes kinda gal. The problem is with all the information coming out about chemicals in our food and the processed meats, etc, as a mom it's very scary for me to think of what I could be giving my kids. I'm trying to buy more organic fruits and veggies and we're researching buying our meats from local farmers rather than the big chain super markets. If you're interested, there's a great documentary on Netflix called "Food, Inc" it will change the way you look at the food on your plate. Or it did for my husband and I.
So we need to learn as much as we can about the Second Amendment now, and we need to urge our neighbors to learn along with us. And intentionally or not, Justice Alito has provided us with such a chance with his majority opinion in McDonald v. Chicago. Even a glancing look at it provides us with insights that neither academia nor the mainstream media would dare communicate to us.
This is not the America that I signed up for. It’s time to take America back. Stand up and make a difference. Let your voice be heard. With all the energy you have, stand up and say”I’m mad as hell, and I’m not going to take this anymore”. But do this in a passive, non violent way. For violence will only makes things worse.
Oh goodness, where to begin with this article. Well, lets start with religious teaching in public schools. Unacceptable. UNLESS, all religions will be equally taught with fact and not opinion. As in, having a religion class, more than likely taught in high schools.
Hurry!!! Book Fotofiesta Photobooth now and make your event an event you and your guests will always remember!!!
6.) Twins
Mrs. Arnold Reeli-Bassackwards (clearing throat): It wasn’t until after the baby came that we realized that for me to be the husband/mommy and her to be the wife/daddy might be too confusing for Alex, so we switched both the parental and marital roles.
The difference now is… I have no more Google Friend Connect. So there went my followers and my method of doing giveaways. (Until we figure out the best new way, that is!)
It would be really easy (seriously, sooo easy) to throw our hands up in the air and give up.
He satisfies your desires and renews your strength
This is looking back at Totora Pampa after having driven through and just around that bend at the back of the previous photo. While I know life is probably pretty damn hard for these folk, who are dedicated to small-scale agriculture and animal husbandry, I always find it hard when visiting such places not to be envious of the apparent tranquility and nearness to nature. As long as I could have all my modern amenities, like a giant stereo, super-speed internet, and 500 channels, this might be a place in which I could retire (smile).
"I realized at a very young age that
What the fuck am I saying? Keep watching your televisions, keep fawning over Hollywood and don’t complain when China wins.
let us kneel before the Lord our Maker;
Fourth, if you are buying a regular vehicle ask for a deal. It’s ok, we’re not like the grocery store (ask for a discount there sometime)! But do keep in mind that we need to make a little money to support our families and to keep the lights on.
I was honored to close the event with a call to prayer for the unified pastors of Sanford, where the nation’s media spotlight is on the Trayvon Martin shooting. Those courageous pastors in Seminole County who are meeting, praying and working across historical racial lines need our prayers and support.
In some cases this has led to a complete and public surrender of journalistic decision-making to the drug trafficking organizations. In one noted editorial after the September 2010 killing of one of its young photographers, “El Diario de Juárez” begged the Juárez cartel, engaged in a bloody war with the Sinaloa cartel, to tell the newspaper what it could and could not write, given the reality that the drug groups ‘are, at this time, the de facto authorities’ in the city.
Help create an internal environment unfriendly to many types of parasites
The sneaking feeling you've read something before-- in this case my own work. I finally got back to working on a new novel last week, that delightful exercise in futility which so consumes my life, and I noticed that it all felt rather familiar. Haven't I written this all before a couple of times? I had to check in with faithful and trusted reader C to make sure I wasn't actually repeating myself. She assures me that I'm not, even though I carry on writing young-ish female protagonists. Maybe it's my tendency to obsess over the same tropes--unrequited love, adventure, travel, beautiful, byronic, untouchable men--that makes me feel I've been down this road before. But those are my themes at this moment in my life, those things bring me to the page. Perhaps I will move on to writing about motherhood or divorce or warlocks or something later but for now--I write what bubbles up.
'Deconstrution' was one of the main themes behind this. Deconstuction uses the idea of making the clothes backwards, by starting with a finished garment and slashing, spoiling and altering it.
Children arrived. Oh my goodness. We won’t go there. That was a blur.
Of course significance, like beauty, is entirely in the eye of the beholder.
Recently Skittles has seen a huge jump in profits, all because it happened to be in the wrong place at the wrong time. Trayvon Martin, the teenager killed by a crime watch volunteer in Sanford, FL, had on a hoody and only a bag of Skittles and a can of ice tea on him at the time he was shot. As a result, those protesting his death have attached new meanings to these items, elevating his hoody and Skittles to the level of symbols. These symbols have become part of Trayvon’s identity and the identity of the movement used to protest the injustice of his death. Especially Skittles, which have been stuffed into T-shirt orders, resold to raise money for the family, handed out at rallies and sent and piled up as symbols of protest. Brands elevated to the status of symbols can take two paths. Either they receive positive brand equity, elevating them to iconic brand status, or negative brand equity because of negative press attention, recalls, etc. In this case, the circumstances surrounding Trayvon’s death have brought negative brand equity on Skittles. Kim Severson notes that on Twitter, people suggest that Wrigley is profiting greatly and should donate money made since his death to the family or causes helping with racial reconciliation in underprivileged communities http://nyti.ms/HzOrbC. Others say that people should boycott the candy until the company gets more involved.
Congrats! Please email me so I can get your prize to you and don't forget to grab your badge from the link on the title bar.
me: this is going up
a friend when you need one
I locked the cat in the cellar. I moved the phone.
6) Use the power of your spiritual strength to carry you in times of weakness.
Today comes word via Pulitzer Prize winning journalist Bill Dedman—the undisputed expert on Miz Clark's pre- and post-death affairs—that the prime minister's offer of $31,500,000—half a mil' more than the combined asking price for the two adjacent but not-joined 8th floor spreads—was accepted by the executors but rejected by the co-operative building's board.
Vidya Balan was absolutely stupendous in this role, and even if we saw only a bit of Reshma, and more Silk, she gave the character such layers and depth. Her sexuality was at the forefront of the film, and the film does not paint her in the victim role. Silk has agency throughout even through her bad choices near the end, and that is what made her such a fascinating central character. It was so heartening to see a woman with sexual agency in an Indian film and though the film frames it through a male's view we do gain an insight into Silk's unabashedly defiant nature.
Thanks for dropping by!
Anyway, here is just part of the press release that a former colleague forwarded to us.
Don't forget to leave a comment on each of the design team members blogs as you're looking for Beach La La, there's going to be La La Land Crafts birthday blog candy given away from each design team members blogs and you don't want to miss out! The winners will be announced August 9th.
Joining the Party:
Over the decades, relationships formed at the Emerson branch that would change lives forever.
Well, last week the silly light went off, they decided to replace the sensor and hopefully that would fix the problem. It didn't! The morning after the replacement was made, I went into my garage, walked to my car, and nearly stepped into a BIG puddle of pink, oily liquid....transmission fluid....all over my garage floor! Hmmmm, that can't be good! I don't know much about cars, but even I could figure out I shouldn't drive it when the transmission fluid was all over my floor!
Terry Pickens, director of nuclear regulatory policy for Xcel Energy, said plant officials encouraged Sarrack to raise the issue within the nuclear industry and paid his travel expenses to a conference to give a presentation.
1 egg (this seems weird, but such a smart addition. It really makes the cheese sauce perfect)
That I had arrived on the dusty doorstep of an uncharted territory.
Dairy (1): 2
"I've had better."
I rarely do shots anymore.
He held a wooden object, beautifully carved from bamboo. The handle was smooth. It had been passed down throughout he centuries because it was magic. He held it out into a fall of crystal blue water. And instead of softly falling to the floor, the water grew.
Jane has also just published “The Story of La Boheme,” an online flip book, in cooperation with the Los Angeles Opera, based on the story and the art from “La Boheme” in her book, “Sing Me A Story.”
I want to be a career builder. I’m building my own career at the moment, so I want to take my authors all the way with me!
And then we have the brown bread, with some lovely, high butter fat Irish butter, fresh and chewy and delicious. I have given this recipe before, most likely last St.Patrick's Day, but if I do say so myself it is an excellent recipe. Not happy with any recipe that I found, I made this one up and worked on it until I got it right. Ideally, you need Irish-style whole wheat flour. I get mine from King Arthur's these days, "a lovely “soft” flour, coarsely ground, a really nice match for the flour used in Ireland for their whole-grain breads". There is a big difference from our whole wheat, which is a hard wheat. I add the yogurt because our buttermilk is sorely lacking and I think it adds a nice tang.
I’m not sure. But until I figure it out, my plan is to use this blog to tell those “wow” stories I come across each week in a different way. To write about what I’m writing about, more or less. Because if I’m going to stand akimbo and shake my finger at the world for not appreciating all the amazing things happening in Michigan, I’d better be doing everything I can to make sure the stories get told.
Project Management & Project planning tools:
Step 3: Add pastry wheat flour, flax and all purpose flour, salt and baking soda and slowly mix until all combined.
This year Palestinian civil society and human rights organizations marked Palestinian Prisoners’ Day with a call to action against the security company, Group 4 Securicor (G4S). G4S maintains, services and provides equipment to Israeli prisons, checkpoints and settlements - all against international law. In effect, G4S profits from the Israeli Occupation and prison system. Earlier this year, the Edinburgh University Student Association (EUSA) passed a motion to block their university's contract with G4S, and just last month the European Union declined to renew its contract with G4S … its time to have G4S excluded from all airports, campuses and other public spaces until it ends its complicity with Israeli crimes.
Application: Most commonly, individuals spread the DE powder in areas where their chickens naturally dust themselves. However, the product may also be dumped into a tub or other container and set out for the birds to use as a dust bath. As well, some individuals prefer to dust their chickens by hand, applying a light coat of powder into the birds’ feathers.
Live Irish music from 12 - 3pm
The wrath of God is being revealed from heaven against all the godlessness and wickedness of men who suppress the truth by their wickedness, since what may be known about God is plain to them, because God has made it plain to them. For since the creation of the world God’s invisible qualities–his eternal power and divine nature–have been clearly seen, being understood from what has been made, so that men are without excuse. For although they knew God, they neither glorified him as God nor gave thanks to him, but their thinking became futile and their foolish hearts were darkened. Although they claimed to be wise, they became fools and exchanged the glory of the immortal God for images made to look like mortal man and birds and animals and reptiles. Therefore God gave them over in the sinful desires of their hearts to sexual impurity for the degrading of their bodies with one another. They exchanged the truth of God for a lie, and worshiped and served created things rather than the Creator–who is forever praised. Amen. Because of this, God gave them over to shameful lusts. Even their women exchanged natural relations for unnatural ones. In the same way the men also abandoned natural relations with women and were inflamed with lust for one another. Men committed indecent acts with other men, and received in themselves the due penalty for their perversion. Furthermore, since they did not think it worthwhile to retain the knowledge of God, he gave them over to a depraved mind, to do what ought not to be done. – Romans 1:18-28
I’m reconsidering the whole working out seven days a week thing. It’s obviously not a streak I should keep up, and then when I finally take a break, it’s for multiple days, or even weeks. No bueno.
Skill: Intermediate or Advanced Beginner (due to color changes and assembly)
The council requested an engineering study of the bypass be completed to determine whether the posted speed limits are appropriate.
I became truly miserable in management. Our accounting long tests were a conglomerate of grammatical mishaps. It would really frustrate me when I answered incorrectly because the tests’ bizarre grammatical style confused me. In our subject called Leadership and Strategy, we had to write a fifty page paper on socks. We had to write about the different inputs to create socks, the kinds of socks, how many people bought different socks, and other equally mind-numbing bullshit. It was the most benign piece that I have ever written in my life, and I had to write fifty pages of it. My course was becoming a form of cruel and unusual punishment, and I couldn’t stand it anymore.
tender mercies and your compassion that never fails.
You can expect to see upcoming lipstick collection posts on Elf Cosmetics and randon brands soon. Click here if you want to see my MAC Cosmetics lipstick collection :)
I. Sepia
attitude about learning is a must. Every bit the child learns will
If we were indoctrinated to hate blacks as Jackson says, then why would we support them, protect them, fight side by side with them?
Chris Levy: “Each character has a well-defined fatal flaw, and these flaws almost lead to the failure of their mission. Tony Stark has major humility issues, threatening his ability to work with the others. Captain America’s long slumber has caused him to be somewhat outdated. Thor is not mortal, and thus does not truly understand human behavior. As the Hulk, Dr. Banner’s flaw is obvious, while the Black Widow struggles to put her dark past behind her. These characters are superhuman, yet still struggle with flaws like every other human.”
To be eligible for a chance to win my blog candy you must become a follower if you aren't already and leave ONE comment on this post.
So my advice for anyone looking to think for yourself – just make sure you agree with them, it may save you a lot of trouble.
Once again, the bill came in much lower than I would have expected, about $10 before tax and tip.
Thanks to my wonderful husband, the suitcases did get unpacked, the housework has been done and my son didn’t have to dig through the refrigerator for himself. Now…all I can do is wait and see if I made it into the final round.
Who knows? Rosmah may join the ranks of the wives of infamous dictators, if the French decide to punish Najib.
Remember the way YOu communicate with your child is likely going to be the way they communicate as well. Parents are their children's models. When we see a 3 year old comforting a crying child or getting the bottle for the baby we are thrilled by that behavior and realize that she has been watching and is imitating behavior she has seen.
This coming Saturday night, Kat Patrick, Jenny Ballam and myself are walking 26.2 miles in order to raise breast awareness and money for research into breast cancer.
However in saying that, it’s apparent that the application isn’t a replacement or even a close equal to its desktop counterpart. Many of the features have been disabled to allow for mobile design; that is smoother transitions, less data, and easier to view content. It’s in this regard where it falls short as a rich user experience–especially for the users who are accustomed to the desktop version. This is becoming a common practice for all high traffic websites to include a mobile version, and disable the standard. Fortunately the essentials such as access to the Posts, Pages, Comments and Stats are all still available and easy to use.
Bacon, Lettuce & Granny Smith Apple Sandwiches with Goat Cheese
Preheat your oven to 425˚F. Line a baking sheet with parchment paper.
and with the success I achieve, I’ll be wanting more.
$5 rr from Sinex
Exposure to bright morning sunlight cures jet lag after a few days in most people. A few will have prolonged sleep phase difficulties. For these, there is a curious treatment that has achieved success.
With my acquiescence, my obedience...........
The Supreme Court issued suo moto intervention directives to address conditions at healing shrines and to reform mental health services and institutions. The chaining of people at shrines was banned, and the adjoining boarding houses were ordered to meet mental health licensing requirements or close down. State governments were directed to galvanise mental health workers to identify people with mental illness at shrines, and to move them into psychiatric homes. These interventions were justified by the various statutory agencies as a mode of defending the human rights of people with mental illness, and as protecting them from exploitation by the operators of shrines and unlicensed asylums.
Paper: DCWV Posies Glitter Stack, Worldwin cardstock
I want to make it perfectly clear that, as you are aware, I am not part, or linked, or connected to the Suidlanders, any volkstaat movement or self-determination movement or any political movement / organisation and I doubt I ever will be.
Lately I’ve been thinking a lot about poverty because I see it all around me everyday. The street I walk down to get to work is always heavily populated by people panhandling for small change to get by. It is depressing to say the least. I’ve seen old ladies and I’ve seen young men. I’ve even seen children. Sometimes I feel like it is straight out of Dickens. Halifax has a depressed economy, high tax and expensive housing. I didn’t know how bad it was until I came here. The situation for artists here must be hard, and I still don’t understand how they survive. Artists have a responsibility to call attention to poverty. That’s what I believe. And in living amongst it perhaps they are more adept at making the situation clear. Statistics Canada has some gruesome numbers about the average wage of an artist.
Making those changes are important to Sheila, but can someone who is in this situation gain the respect of her coworkers—some of whom have been with the organization as long as she has and have become her close friends in the process? How can she do that without resorting to the old style of leadership her predecessors exercised? Can she balance the two, being an effective and impartial professional supervisor while maintaining friendship with her staff?
He is a man, who presumably started life as a human, but choose evil so willingly and wholeheartedly that he can barely identified as such anymore. In fact, it is suspected that the devil has given him a third eye so as to better see and manipulate people.
Well, I've been out of town for a work convention. Thank goodness it is all over now so I can get back to my boring routine. I love my boring routine! *cheer*
world, and especially for her purity. Oh Father, keep us, we beseech Thee,
01. Listen To Her Heart
Seriously! Does Britney have no one around her that can say "Girlfriend you need to check yo'self in the mirror before you go outside"
In 1882: a writer in the Atlantic Monthly predicted ... "Our era . . . of happy immunity from those social diseases which are the danger and the humiliation of Europe is passing away . . . every year brings the conditions of American labor into closer likeness to those of the Old World. An American species of socialism is inevitable." (4)
We are so lucky to live near such wonderful people. We did not grow up here. By many measures, we are still “outsiders”. However, we feel “adopted” and part of this community. This tornado may have damaged our house and farm, but it certainly reinforced our belief in the goodness of humans. We are lucky. We are lucky. I keep saying that to myself and people keep congratulating me on my positive outlook. I do not deserve that congratulations. It is the sincere offers of help and well-wishes that lead me to believe that “we are lucky”.
I've always loved my space.
Although this a slim book, it's packed with pictures and brewing history. The main focus of the book is the burgeoning beer scene, chronicling not only the history of the Anheuser Busch brewery, but Saint Arnolds, Buffalo Bayou, Karbach Brewing, No Label Brewing, and Southern Star Brewing. He also covers Houston's vibrant home brewing culture.
Published in 2009
Cheers - Joolz
Items to toss:
Vote Green!
There I go again, giving up, I can’t give up; I’ve come too close this time, I am going to get out of this.
(I am realizing my body is very sensitive to inflammation. And that changing my diet is simply not enough. Stress causes inflammation, too. I'm thinking triangulating between Paleo-y diet - practicing Qigong/walking - self-care as a highly sensitive is where I'd like to get myself to this Spring and into the Summer.)
(ii) The accused must have the opportunity to subject witnesses to visual and auditory observation at a time contemporaneous with the reception of the witness’s evidence
This past weekend, Best Man Justin became Groom Justin ... which means that I got to spend an amazing week in the northeast of France with some amazing people ... and it means that we've got a lot of catching up to do.
State University was accommodating. I stayed in their dormitory
Some see a teacher
Street Date: July3, 2012
Speaking of which, I’m still avoiding everyone (I mean everyone) like the plague. Just so I don’t have to confront certain feelings/fake happiness. I have to do enough of that at work. And I did a whole lot of that today – I was at my desk typing away, when I got choked up & it hit me – “I don’t deserve this. I need better. I’m settling. I’ve worked hard to be paid more.” Nothing new, but it hit me hard today for some reason. & please, save the “at least it’s a job/that’s part of being an adult” stuff – true, but I’m not for it today.
Its amazing how quickly you can change your clothes and put on foundation and lipstick when you try.
Since we're designing our own pizza, I decided to go all out. I had Gorgonzola cheese, eggplant, and Italian Sausage. So let's see, cheese - check, veggie - check, meat - check.
1 Rehwinkel, Alfred, The Flood. Saint Louis, Missouri. 1951. Print.
Further, assuming Zimmerman did in fact violate the law and is charged with a crime and does go to prison no anti-gun group or member of the media (but I repeat myself) will say, "Well, damn, I guess that law doesn't protect criminals after all." What they will say is, "ZOMG!! PEOPLE WHO ARE ALLOWED TO CARRY GUNS WILL SHOOT EVERY BLACK KID THEY SEE WALKING DOWN THE STREET!!!"
G.R. No. L-3054
Kanhar eyed the strange man standing at their door. Kata smiled, extended his hand and said, “I’m your new friend, Pabitra Kata.”
These quotes describe different realms of influence of Secret Societies. The first one refers to the spiritual side while the second describes the political side. Not all Secret Societies dwell in the spiritual and not all of them get involved in political machinations. The Bavarian Illuminati operated in both realms.
Just a Little Bit by Bobby King & Terry Evans
How does your family feel about you being in law enforcement?
1) First up, spokescharacters on TV and Spam’s ‘Sir Can-A-Lot.’ Yes, spam’s agency has rolled out a spokescharacter to celebrate 75 years and its name is ‘Sir Can-A-Lot’ http://bit.ly/zCMgjS.
One of the arms did stay in the reaching forward position and one knee did stay bent. Of course, if staked in the yard you could form the pose better.
SO my dear babies, probably this blog will return to at least weekly posting after easter. Let's pretend we gave it up for Lent.
never used them in any of his other symphonies. In my
The study found that 20% of adults today aged 18 to 29 are married, compared with 59% in 1960.
Those who purchase a 5-night, 6-day Magic Your Way Package with accommodations at a select Disney Value Resort get a free Disney Quick-Service Dining Plan.
The SNP with nearly 450,000 votes trailed in a poor second with a paltry 15.6% and a mere 181 wards.
Thank you to all who attended our Book Club and to those who followed along online. We will take a break over the next couple of months while the weather is so beautiful. Enjoy.
3: Bloodflow connoisseur(B), Demonic taskmaster(B)
I have a friend whose child is four and going through chemo treatments. Another friend has a two-year old with spina bifida who has had eight major surgeries and has spent probably a fourth of her life in some sort of cast. I feel selfish when I think of that and ashamed for feeling sorry for myself.
Most family members who have lost a loved one to SUDEP had either no idea, or only a vague notion, of the risk of death inherent in an epilepsy diagnosis. I’m sure most, like me, if they thought about it at all, understood that a person with epilepsy’s risk of death stems from secondary factors such as respiratory failure from a blocked airway, or a head injury resulting from a fall during a tonic-clonic seizure. No one that I have read about seemed to know an estimated 18% of all deaths of people with epilepsy are attributed to the mysterious and unexplained phenomenon of SUDEP.
3. A village feel, Sydney is very much a series of neighbourhoods characterised by small independent shops and I love having a local butcher, baker and if not a candlestick maker certainly a fantastic cookware shop that could rustle up a variety of romantic lighting in the flame line.
But alas. It IS better for my family. And it will save us a ton of money. And while I’m not one to clip coupons or only shop at the grocery stores that have the bargains this week, I DO think I need to be a better steward of what God’s given me in this area. Plus, it will be healthier for us. The food industry is pretty gross these days and I constantly feel convicted about not taking the time to prepare my week in such a way, so that I don’t need to eat out. But I’m exhausted and don’t take time to do it. Well, tomorrow starts a new day for me.
When a post gets to be too long, no matter how many pictures you throw in there to try and stimulate the reader (it's the "Oh, shiny" effect we're all going for to try and reel the audience back in), the reader is going to click away from you.
As a medical transciptionist I sit here for many hours each day transcribing everything from infant chest x-rays to mammograms to CT scans, but some days it can be quite monotonous. I have always enjoyed a challenge and some days I wonder if I am not doing enough with my life.
I got halfway through the automatic doors and this boot-lock-thingy on my cart snapped shut and stopped me in my tracks. I hit the handlebar I was holding with an “oof”.
Keeping World Shiny And Tight And Well Disciplined
Hey Nate - you guys are 2-9. You have no cause to be guaranteeing anything. Just shut up and play. You and the rest of those knuckleheads on your team. Just shut up and play. No chest thumping, no first down gestures, no end-zone celebrations, no sack dances. You guys have not earned that right. Your team has sucked for 40 years - it takes more than a single catch or a single sack for you to celebrate anything. Just give the ball back to the ref and go back to the huddle and do it all again until you win the game. Then celebrate.
So, I recently signed up for an Ugly Fabric Swap on the regretsy forums. There are frequently fun swaps going on in the forums. I don’t feel like I can afford to join all of them, but I couldn’t resist this one. I sent my recipient some choice selections from my fabric collection, including some earthworm-patterned fabric and some ribbon with rather ugly panda bears. And here’s what I got from the person who drew my name:
By the time I get to the check-out counter, I can tell that the cashier and all of the other customers sympathize with my children. They're eyeing me with suspicion because they overheard me say that I think that Parisian waiters are superior to American ones. I slink out the door feeling like a blasphemous traitor - I'm in Boston after all, the birthplace of our nation, and complimenting the French!
Jerrica, one of my first Toys for Troops supporters, is waiting in Kuwait in 121-degree heat to begin her second tour in Iraq. Pictured on the right, she told me in a quick Facebook chat today that she can't wait to get home.
Cranberry Chutney with orange, apple and spices. This was completely consumed this year. Usually cranberry sauce/chutney is left over and gets tossed after a few days. This is the basic recipe that I might change slightly each year. The recipe I used for this year is here.
Lawmakers from Bucks and Montgomery counties are pushing for an end to pensions for new lawmakers and school and state employees, while advocating for a 401(k)-style retirement vehicle to get taxpayers off the hook for years when the stock market suffers huge losses.
It's bittersweet....truly
Despite the tiny sample pour size, every single beer I’m interested in trying has a huge queue to get those miniscule measures. The size of the measures simply feeds back into making the queues bigger. It’s therefore impossible to get a good taste of a great beer. The system is broken.
his mother and father kissed a lot
Forget what happened yesterday,
I'm easing back into my blogging state with a simple inspiration post. I thought I should begin blogging more regularly again because of the many upcoming things I have going on. Working on an interview with the photographer Neave, interning at Chic Little Devil styling and PR house as well as volunteering various events for LA Fashion Week, participating in various projects for MODE magazine and just my overall life as a FIDM student let loose in LA / Hollywood.
“Oh,” she said. “Well, if you need help, let me know.”
When you dig something out of your nose and exclaim, "I've got a booger...who wants it?", you should have been able to tell by the looks of disguest that no one wants it.
All I can personally say is, wow! I have really enjoyed making this film, loved working with all the talented people that were involved on and off set, and as a film maker, I have learnt a hellova lot from it…so here’s to a great première! and may I have the opportunities to create more adventures of The Halsteadarian and his bizarre world =)
Aroma: The first impression is of lightly roasted grain with some biscuit and a touch of green grass. The second visit introduced a hint of buttered corn and a bit of a tang. The third nose-dive revealed no new suprises.
Tutor was dull as ever, but fortunately it didn’t run on that long :) However, in our double free, Catherine had convinced me to stay after College for the History revision sessions. I agreed to stay for the Crimean War one, but not the WW1 one, because I felt like I needed a refresher of Crimea more, as it has been months since we did anything on it. So after Tutor I went back to the LRC, to sit with Catherine, Anna, Rebecca and a girl called Abi (who is in Catherine’s Classics class I think, it may have been Psychology, not sure ;D), and did half of the second 2008 Geology paper. However, before I finished it was time for Lunch, which decided to enjoy, so we went to the Undercroft, where we sat with Jenny A, Shikha and Andrew M, although I mainly talked to Catherine, Jenny and Anna. We talked about revision and various other stuff that I can’t quite remember. Then after lunch, when Jenny left, we decided to stay to revise in the Undercroft, but we only managed about 10 minutes before the party turned to parties. We talked about Ollie Cl’s party, and Catherine made a list of all the people she might invite to her potential party (I think she ended up with about 69 people), and me and Anna helped her. So I’m gunna need to get that paper finished tomorrow at Lunch.
The Crab Risotto turned out to be AMAZING - very creamy, at perfect density, temperature, and evenly infused with flavor. The sweet corn added a slight crunch to break up the creaminess, and the trout roe added bubbles of liquid saltiness that popped pleasantly over the mix and on the palate.
Flouting the terms of the United Nations resolution authorizing “all means necessary” to protect civilians, NATO powers, including the US, France and Britain, sent in special forces troops, military contractor mercenaries and intelligence agents to arm, organize and lead the so-called “rebels,” whose primary function was to draw out Libyan government forces so they could be annihilated from the air.
“The unlawful killing of a human being, when perpetrated by any act imminently dangerous to another and evincing a depraved mind regardless of human life, although without any premeditated design to effect the death of any particular individual, is murder in the second degree and constitutes a felony of the first degree, punishable by imprisonment for a term of years not exceeding life or as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084.”
Who in flesh the vict’ry won.
GC: What do you plan on accomplishing by the end of training camp?
The whole book was so lightweight and thin that I really can’t rec it.
As you may remember, Gordon is a member of the local parish council and much to his delight (not!) was appointed councillor in charge of footpaths and bridleways. If you know any farmers you may be aware they don’t really like people walking around on their land since ‘the general public’ tend to leave gates open, drop litter, allow their dogs to poop wherever they like (and not pick it up since it is the countryside), and generally flatten crops by walking over them – and yes, grass is a crop too!
In the end, I chose Classical Greek… only to discover that I, in a typically unique fashion, had been the only person in my year to choose it, and so they couldn’t run the course. It looked like I was stuck with Art.
“Well, I’m all for having international support, but I’m really baffled by the idea that somehow an international assembly provides a legal basis for the United States military to be deployed in combat,” Sessions said. “They can provide no legal authority. The only legal authority that’s required to deploy the United States military is of the Congress and the president and the law and the Constitution.”
Hello, there! I'm back from my Michigan trip and had a wonderful time (even though the event was sad, it was not unexpected). Sometime this week, I'll give you some of the inside story of what I was up to, either as a blog post, or on my FB page. Don't forget to "Like" me if you don't, already.
Invulnerable though naked, save where clouds roll round her loins
Weialala leia
Presale tickets for the Soiled Dove show on February 2 are available starting December 30 at 10AM MST at https://www.vendini.com/ticket-software.html?e=31f3b4d756e87937437269292afdb610&t=tix
“At school I was always trying to con my teachers into letting me act out book reports instead of writing them.” Laura Linney
In this photo, taken several years ago, she is in front of a very large oak tree that she planted as a tiny sapling some 70 years ago!
FACT: Hill returned to Doctor Who for an appearance as the priestess Lexa in the Fourth Doctor story ‘Meglos’.
That your life has a greater purpose.
well there are just a few photos.
16. The Wedding - Annie / 5:09
People in Sarawak should read it too. It explains how Taib put his cousin and nominee, and a handful of other key players, into all the key roles to create a single hub of political and economic control designed to enrich himself and his family.
Meanwhile, I am supposed to be training. I feel a really complicated mix of excitement, anticipation, dread, and depression before, during, and after the appointments. This is an opportunity. I hide from men when I feel this complication. Now I have to face it. I pre-paid for three months of appointments for twice a week.
The price apparently is a cool £250,000 if you have it. In return you get to meet the prime minister, put your point of view forward, and ask any question.
The: leaders of the vaShawasha who killed the Europeans were caught and judged by the High Court. They were found guilty and were sentenced to death. The names of
He then added: "One of the reasons it’s so expensive is because you have to shmear (meaning pay various individuals for their assistance) all the time."
For the thousandth time Mackinson measured his own character and for the thousandth time was reassured by the knowledge that he was bound straight for hell. A man of real character would refrain from any and all temptation. Mackinson fell way short. Every time.
03 talk: Gillian's intro about recording Not Afraid to Die with Willie Nelson 1:41
I am drawn time and again to these mythical otters, as well as to rumors of a heron rookery down past the dead-end of my street, perched in maples or alders above a ravine -- the same ravine where on a sunny Sunday afternoon twenty years ago a SWAT team apprehended a shooting suspect.
“The public has given a clear vote of confidence to clean British energy from our wind, sun and sea. It makes no sense for the government to pursue an unwanted, costly dash for gas that’s causing our fuel bills to rocket,” said Craig Bennett, Friends of the Earth’s director of policy and campaigns.
And in a fit of stupidity I lef the church (to pick up a part time job if you will), but in my heart I had been searching for this type of community of spiritual life lived fully. The title on the building is irrelevant.
Couples typically wait an average of six years in an unhappy marriage before seeking help, according to the Seattle-based Gottman Institute. Deciding whether to leave a committed relationship can be a sad and complex process.
I have entered it into a few challenges that are listed below.
Soooo.... in answer to the 2 questions I have been asked REPEATEDLY over the past two months (What are fiddleheads?/how do you cook them?) .........
Enjoy Your Run. Enjoy Your Day :0
What amazes me about this paraglider contraption is that it utilizes the same technology (fabric and ropes) that was around 400 years ago. Technically, Leonardo da Vinci, one of the early champions of the thought of human flight, had everything he needed to fly. He was never able to. But the flight issue just needed some time and some other thinkers to give their input to solving the problem.
Raymond stood silent as he was a little frightened of Andrew. He would never admit to that, but you could see it with him fidgeting amongst his own fingers; tapping them against one another, counting the taps.
I’m okay with not being able to go back. We have chosen to go forward since the day Miranda was born. Losing her did not change our direction, it just jostled the path.
and 2 more pieces (for the top and bottom) 12 in x 4in.
How much did I read this weekend? Lately it seems as if I've been reading like a bear prepares for winter: storing up stories before I get writing this summer. Here's my reading weekend break down: 1675 pages, 4 books, 15 1/2 hours reading. No wonder I didn't get the laundry done!
The corners of his mouth turned up. He had warned her that he never forgot anything and this time her smart mouth was going to be her downfall. He liked it when she risked her well being with her smart arsed comments. He was going to enjoy very much adjusting her attitude in that area, not too much, not to damage her spirit, just enough to help her think twice about the consequences which may ensue.
-I bought girl scout cookies, even though I am trying to lose way. Samoas are my fav.
I enjoyed every moment of it those two days, though i didnt find time to read the Canibal, i had some crazy thoughts all known to me…
PS Since I wrote the first draft of this post, it's emerged that fewer and fewer pupils are opting to study History for GCSE. Eve Edwards argued recently on this blog that historical novels should be used to enthuse children about history and she's right. She says, also, that History is being studied in all sorts of interesting ways today, when it IS studied. But I think there's also room for presenting it as a series of thrilling stories, just as H. E.Marshall did in her book.
"I love you without knowing how, or when, or from where.
Hazel's been really busy this week, and hopped in quite a few times with lovely goodies to share. Firstly, such a striking butterfly card here with the sentiment printed using Safmat, reminding me how useful that stuff is - if I can remember where it is! Then, some really fun sticky note holders - those animals are just too cute Hazel! A Christmas card was next, with a beautiful sentiment and two really sweet owls, followed by a reindeer Christmas card and the reindeer on the image in the centre has such a cute expression on his face! Altered notebooks are a favourite with Hazel and her first one this week just sings of Springtime, here. Then, Hazel brought a really bright and cheerful card with some truly zingy flowers on - sometimes I'd love to be given just half an hour to go and rummage through all of Hazel's snippets! Another beautiful floral altered notebook was next, in pinks - my favourite colour just in case anyone hadn't guessed :) Then Hazel kicked off her own Craftyhazelnuts Christmas Challenge for this coming week with a Christmas card (of course). The theme is a house, home or part of a house such as a fireplace - and Hazel had chosen a house within a 'snow globe', really effective too!
Blood donors rarely get to meet or know the individuals they help; likewise, recipients rarely get the chance to thank the folks whose donation saved their lives. America’s Blood Centers has started a Thank-A-Donor wall, http://thanksdonor.com/, where both donors and recipients can add their stories. Take a moment to check it out, and add your story if you would like. It only takes a moment.
Some of the blogs I have been reading have said about a word, or mantra, people are using this year and I have decided mine will be the following;
Changes to the Interim Federal Health Program for current and future refugee claimants go into effect June 30.
Picture this: a piece of gum stuck to a chair, which has become crystallized. NOTHING WOULD REMOVE THAT GUM.
Stay tuned. :)
A vital part of our proposals is that Cabinet, Government Ministers or politicians are prohibited from instructing or directing these new agencies in any way.
I held her soft hand. It was warm. The ventilator humming softly, off and on. Breathing in and out. Looking at her it was almost like she was asleep in her chair again, breathing softly and peacefully. I looked past all the monitors, tubes, and cords, and looked right at my beautiful grandma. I told her that I loved her and I was going to miss her dearly. That her great grand babies would miss her. That her lap was Wyatt's favorite place since he was a baby. That Taylor loved to color with her, and looked forward to all the goodies she would bring her like strawberries, blueberry muffins, and walnuts. I told her that I was so thankful for everything that she taught me, all the memories, and everything I would miss about her. I told her I loved her more than she could know and that she was the biggest blessing to our family.
Johannesburg - Three KwaZulu-Natal police officers were arrested on Wednesday for allegedly assaulting a man with broom and mop handles, the Independent Complaints Directorate (ICD) said.
And also I believe in rewarding myself even for small goals…So each time I set one I will also set a reward for hitting it….Bigger the goal Bigger the reward
Seriously good.
Abstract
Important than
Yes, that is two large pots full of chopped onions. 10 pounds of onions to be precise. I have no idea how I did that in one sitting. (Well, actually I was standing, but still.) It's definitely something to be proud of living through.
***Supports lean muscle mass and a healthy metabolism
* The Flyers were the better, faster team. Yes, the Penguins did themselves no favors by allowing the Flyers to capitalize on an absurd number of Power Play chances (to say nothing of Shorthanded Chances/Goals Against), but the Flyers dictated play and tempo at five-on-five for much of the series. The Penguins, especially their star players, were forced to spend too much of the time batting for and chasing the puck, which took away from their ability to make plays offensively.
Another Valentine's Day themed manicure! It was originally planned to be all 5 nails with a masked splatter design, but it just didn't look right, so I decided to change it up a bit. I loved how the thumbnail turned out, so I kept that splatter pattern, and changed the other nails. I had an idea a while back to do heart shaped leopard spots for Valentine's day, so I did that on the index finger, a varying thickness line-based heart for the middle finger, stitched hearts over glitter for the ring finger, and the way I draw hearts when I write them on paper. :)
The post soon attracted public attention. An unidentified netizen condemned the local birth control office vehemently in his comment on the post:
Plus, every month, they have special freebies that are only allotted to the first 10,000 people! And these freebies are LARGE freebies, not just wimpy little samples!
I am finding out from emails from both men and women that problematic tangueros and tangueras do not necessarily focus just on the young -- but the newcomer is indeed the person who is most vulnerable. Also, I would like to note that the tango community is probably safer than some religious institutions. Predatory behavior hides in every corner. Read the book I have suggested above. Knowledge is power.
An extraordinary concert from two firm favourites here at Victoryrosemusic. The quality isn't great and due to various issues there is a track or two missing. However it was such an amazing performance I thought it worth a post. Think of it as a preview of great things to come! Ólafur talks a lot in this concert which is great to hear as well.
children good manners. Don't get me wrong I teach my kids and
And live skin. And my flesh.
Happy Growing!
And over him drew her net.
he said nothing.
The rest of the money was set aside to purchase three full city blocks along 1st Street, which were designated to be the site of a future municipal complex.
Thanks to everyone who entered the competition. I can honestly say that I enjoyed reading each and every entry, from the poetic, to the prosaic, to the illustrative. Honourable mentions must go Neil Walker for his oblique (and, now I go to write it, unlikely-sounding) fusion of Bob Dylan and John Betjeman, and to Chris Cutting for the cartoon (you have to admire anyone who accompanies such a submission with the explanation “I know it doesn't comply to any of the requirements - please bear in mind I've recently taken on a job with a much longer train journey of late and have time on my hands.”)
Patek Philippe Nautilus Moonphase 3712
Troupe 1-14
2” inch round scallop cutter
It’s a short interview with a resident Mould Maker at Minkstone Works in Longton, and investigates the more poetic aspects of this traditional craft. The Mould Maker’s task is to make solid the inverse of every piece of casted ceramic produced in the Pottery, using clay and plaster to enclose the void space in which the alchemy of pottery production can begin. This process of shaping object then void, sculpture then space, positive then negative, is rich with conceptual architectural inspiration.
7 comments
It's the 8th day of Chinese New Year, and I have been back to work today. Lots of people start work today, as it's conveniently we took off the week for the CNY celebration. As of today, I just want to jot down the event of the week, and later make the one by one post. My memory is failing me recently, therefore I better make sure I done some 'preliminary' recording before the details kick in.
09. Sea Groove
And what is the success of his happiness? He seems to live a rather epicurean life that Omar Khayyam prescribes as:
Oriental Beef and Broccoli
Does she use 3 to 5 words in a sentence? Um, yeah. Times 5, with verbal variety and proper punctuation.
I work with attorney all the time and there are some I even consider friends, but I will not miss taking their calls, which most often come too late to do their client any good. A typical scenario is the lawyer will call three weeks before a trial has been set and want some forensic accounting done on something or other. This is good. It is something I do. But, when I look at the case, it is obvious there needs to be three months of work done.
There was another group of 4 middle aged males standing in a closed circle quite near to the group of women. 3 out of the 4 had sports hold-alls (could mean that two are related, possibly father and son as one does seem older than the rest). They looked like they were going away for a 'lads weekend' probably to watch spot, either football or rugby but not to play sport.
Confession time, I kind of liked the first Ghost Rider. It had its problems but the look of it was pretty good and at least entertained me. However it looks like this sequel that should have never been is going to set everything right. From the trailer it seems Cage is striking the right balance of insane, humour and angst, while the directors are giving us crazy action. Do you expect any less from the directors of Crank?
They will kill that fellow and Obama will use it to portray himself as a strong leader who sacrificed an American, father, husband in a tough decision to stand ground against terror for our freedom.
Yellow paint
Understanding the body language you observe in others is as important as managing your own body language. Brush up on these secrets to learn what others are saying.
Losers.)
Fasting is something else that can be a part of an encounter with God. Sometimes a physical fast from food is associated with an encounter with God. Actually a fast can come before meeting God, or after meeting God. Some people meet God and then begin fasting as Saul fasted for three days after seeing Jesus the Damascus road. In this case, Elijah fasted for 40 days before he encountered God on Mount Sinai.
Latin:
157. Wizard in the Tree, The: Lloyd Alexander
I have been informed I am on the roster of Apartment Therapy's Homie Awards,
Have I mentioned how much I love my job? Oh, I have?... sorry... :-)
One of my office buddies asked me how I could consider people I would never meet my friends. I asked him what he knew about allowing for the turn of the cloth on the roll line of a collar stand, he just rolled his eyes. I think its a little arrogant to assume that the best people to be friends with are within arms reach, sometimes we just need to grow long arms.
(Actually, even if you hate undercovercops, email me anyway. I really would love to hear, ehm, read what's on your great minds)
go on sale beginning Friday, May 11th.
Mahaney: This conference exists for ordinary pastors.
Level 16: MP Cost: 12, Damage: 320%, Attacks up to 5 enemies.
Do I stroll with earthly balance
We walked almost to the end of the galloping path and then headed back for home. Here we are at the start of the galloping lane.
Good-bye.
photographer, computer technician, and actors to produce extrasensory photographs. Though the scenes viewed in the final works are complex with multiple players, each actor is
So, as much as I love Word, I know it can betray you when you're not looking and nothing must prevent us from reading through our work once we've finished it. A single click could make so much damage to a manuscript.
No top athlete has ever said that being a gymnast is a breeze. Just as it is for writers, it takes years of practice, of ripping skin and muscle, of putting yourself out there to constantly be evaluated before you can ever hope of rising to the top and getting noticed by those who appreciate your sport.
We can not change what has already happened. We can't go back and run faster in a race. We can't train harder for an event that has already occurred. We can't un-injure ourselves no matter how much we want to. All we can do is accept the present and look for the silver lining. Good things can come from bad situations. Don't we grow and learn so much in our most adverse times (and no, I don't think having a broken toe is my most adverse time!)?
For me, my next game will be on Friday at Friday Night Magic. It will be the first FNM where Avacyn cards will be legal in standard play. What can you expect? How did you change your own deck and what cards should you add? Should you change anything at all? In all likeliness, the metagame won’t change too much in the first week or two. Rather, what will happen is that people will take the good cards they got in Avacyn Restored and a) find a good spot for them in a current type of deck that’s popular in the metagame or b) they’ll force cards into decks that shouldn’t be there. Needless to say, this week will have a lot of growing pains.
pps: "so you say you care. tell me how much you know about the sufferings of the palestinians." - insert meme. this was what i thought about myself when i was at the talk. yes, being sarcastic to myself seems to give me more drive to get my arse moving.
So we're down to 3 hens at the moment. 1 big girl and 2 bantams. Not a good start to the year for our livestock, but we'll be building up numbers again come summer. If Amy lets me...
I flipped the sketch so I could use this beautiful image!
If we had an upcoming test on English class or whatever, I’d give my mother my book and notebook. I’d tell her what topics were covered by the test, and I’d ask her to make ten questions or so about these topics. She can choose to make either multiple choice questions, true or false questions, or fill in the blanks.
They might eventually decide to return to South Africa or they might not. It remains their right to choose. Furthermore, although they are now living in a new country, they will continue to have their viewpoint and their opinions on South Africa.
I love this place, steeped in history. Beautiful at anytime, but especially so at first light.
I remember this planning stage very very well. It was only a year ago that I was one month away from becoming a Mrs. The 30 days leading up to a wedding are generally considered the most intense. To all the SOON TO BE MRS.’s out there, I salute you. Planning a wedding isn’t easy, and its such an epic day. The stress is UNBELIEVABLE and 100 worth it!
it worked
just usLoading…12/7/09
One of the great 19th century American "fireside poets"
Couple’s today are increasingly concerned about the costs of planning a wedding that meets their desires yet which is also affordable. In San Diego this can be a challenge when adding up all the costs from the various vendors that provide the different services for the wedding. There are flowers, pictures, menus for several meals, attire, music and of course, the venue. However, if you begin with the right venue, the anxiety and expense related to all the necessary services can be greatly limited.
Moreover, there are many reasons why spot gold rebounded back towards the $1650 level within hours of the otherwise disappointing Fed statements on April 25 and headed higher the next day.
And like Jesus Christ, your saviour?
i've long been wanting to use pink as my color pop and started with the gossip bench.
Carl DiFranco, 27, New York, N.Y.
Oh, Joan, too bad, so sad.
all: all disks
First step take a trip to the thrift store, or garage sale and find a book.
I have so many things on my mind right now.
Disc 3B (October 3rd 1995) Yoyogi Olympic Pool, Tokyo, Japan
In other SWEN from around the globe...
Since when did Facebook begin to hold such power over us in our lives? It is a website, a phone app, yet it has the power to crush and humiliate. I speak from personal experience. In the last week, I have been unfriended by my dear sister in law for who knows what reason...We haven't shared a word on there for a few weeks. I only noticed that I hadn't seen pictures of my niece in a while, so I went to her wall. Guess what? She was gone...No wall. It makes me sad how easily people can dispose of you on Facebook. Squishing you under their feet like a used cigarette. I've been unfriended before by my husband's brother. TWICE. He just doesn't like me. And when he decided he wanted to be my friend again, my husband councils me to just accept his friendship to avoid confrontation and trouble. So there I am floating on the tides of other people moods. And you know what?
Suffice it to say, it wasn't my best parenting moment, but we've learned that my son is very good in the face of an emergency which includes watching his mother turn an inhuman shade of green-white, as her eyes roll back in her head and her normal self disappears from conscious view.
Since the first roses cake I made was so popular (inspired from the rose cake tutorial by I Am Baker), I decided to decorate this cake the same way. Using a 1M Wilton tip, I piped large roses all over the cake, and filled in the remaining spaces with swoops and swirls. I loved the way the specks (from the browned butter) in the frosting showed through the peachy color of the frosting. Although, while my frosting started out to be the perfect peachy color, after a few hours the color set and turned into more of a bright orange sherbet color! It wasn't what I was originally going for, but it actually worked out to match the whole Thanksgiving theme of the cake.
- Article 5 states: No law enforcement official may inflict, instigate or tolerate any act of torture or other cruel, inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment, nor may any law enforcement official invoke superior orders or exceptional circumstances such as a state of war or a threat of war, a threat to national security, internal political instability or any other public emergency as a justification of torture or other cruel, inhuman or degrading treatment or punishment.
I see people obsessing over sports and don’t really understand what the big deal is (see: Color Commentator). I see people loving cars, and think, what a waste of time and energy. Just like some people may not understand why I know so much about obscure zombie films (see: Zombie Hall… no seriously… If you’ve been wondering where the hell I have been, I have been writing there lots…). Some people try to keep up to date with all of the newest gadgets and iDildoes, learn about fine wine, or eat all sorts of soft cheeses. I sort of get it, but who has the money for that?
the kid had a number of holes in his theories which he and theLeon were hashing out before theLeon had to go do some industrial constructiony electricalness.
I didn't take my phone (yes, that same old phone) out with me today and I hesitate in buying a phone with more progressive technology because I don't enjoy constant connection. I don't want to be linked up with every single person I know at every moment of the day. I was slow to warm to the cell phone in general. I originally embraced it as a tool for emergencies, to be kept in my car.
The joy to grow a seen unseen,
Meanwhile, Spaceweather.com said early today that “some observers are reporting that comet 103P/Hartley 2 has reached the threshold of naked eye visibility.” I wrote them challenging those reports. No response, but I noticed that by 2 pm the earlier update had been taken down and a new one replaced it – one that makes no mention of “near naked eye visibility.
Why? I'm completely overwhelmed right now, but I do crave a great read to take me away from pressing stressors each day.
I'm breathing a huge sigh of relief as I am finally unpacked, with internet connected and my craft supplies all ready to go! I had some requests for Spring and Summer DIY art projects, so I thought I'd start out with something pretty easy and highly customizable!
American economic reality is something else entirely – rougher going than we like to think, but not an evil thing. Bear in mind that the transparency of our system remains very high compared to most non-capitalist settings, where goods are scarce and the economic infrastructure is all but dysfunctional. The watchdog agency Transparency International’s Global Corruption Barometer always ranks the United Statesamong the very best in its country by country listings. In those countries ranked lower, nepotism, bribery, and under-the-table transactions accompany virtually all basic economic transactions. By contrast, while connections here can help in getting a job, education, merit, and ability also matter.
ordinarily choose. Too "frilly and gourmet" for them!
good evening guys,
You want to leave your work and do something you love? DO it. Regardless of what happens you will have tried, and if your doing something you love you will work twice as hard to be able to keep doing it.
Saturday, December 4, I was super hungover and felt like crap most of the morning. And, I often feel depressed the day after I drink. I didn’t realize this about myself until my mom pointed it out recently. I told her I was incredibly sad, and I didn’t know why. She was kind enough to say, “Catherine, you drank last night. You are always sad after you drink. Don’t you know this?” It was like an epiphany. So, much of Saturday, I was hungover and feeling quite down. I was also super embarrassed about my stalker drive-by the night before. I spent much of the day questioning the reasons I was with Chef and feeling really unsure about our relationship.
Karen MacPherson's syndicated Children's Corner column this week alerted me to an important occasion: the 50th birthday of Frances, star of the classic picture book series by Russell Hoban. (I strongly recommend reading Karen's column - always good and this one is chock full of interesting facts about Frances and how she came to be. Also, if you haven't read the Frances books, it's time to get to the library. Or better yet, go buy them.)
How about a fun Halloween card today. I love to color so this card was done with Prisma color pencils and odorless mineral spirits. I stamped the images from Raisin Boats Haunting Potions with black ink. I die cut the colored image with spellbinders dies as well as the mats. ( Play around with your dies and combined different shapes it can really be a fun to see what the layers can look like.) I edged the white with a sponge and black ink. I also used a spider web embossing folder on part of the card and rubbed gently with a sponge and black ink to make the spider web stand out.This was a fast and fun card to do. I tend to color 3 images at the same time to save time and have extras for more cards or Halloween treats.
“No, I am not… but I didn’t understand… you talk to gals all the time… why you are shy now?”
Snuggled in a wooded setting among farmlands along the River Maigue is the quaint village of Adare. On your journey to Dromoland Castle we will stop in this charming town for lunch and a brief visit before heading to Newmarket-on-Fergus.
Small problem... unicorns are much too shy to have their photographs taken – the best you’re likely to get is a fuzzy snap of our tails as we disappear into the enchanted mist. Professional photography studios and five hours of hair and make-up are obviously out. Anyway, I am a muse and take many forms, depending on the kind of book Katherine is writing at the time. (She’s blogged about me HERE if you want to see some of those forms), but none seemed quite right for my first appearance as a muse in a real book.
6. What book are you looking forward to reading this summer (that is written by an author you don't personally know)? Any other books that you've already read that you would recommend to A2A readers for summer reading?
'Bye hon, be safe'.
Videogames the newest and youngest art form is unique. Unlike music videogames are often less personal a guy playing GTA isn’t a dirty drug dealing low life. Someone playing Manhunt isn’t a psychotic killer. Videogames do something no other art forms can do. They take you and place you in situations and environments you could never delve into in real life. They transport you to a world limited only by the technology and imagination limitations of the artists.
Here are some things you may think you know about hypnosis that are actually pure myths:
Written in a modern and experimental style, this poetry compilation by Sofia M. Starnes contemplates the aesthetics of faith. Often drawing from Bible stories, this collection indirectly alludes to Christian themes and creates extended metaphors that spill from one poem to another. Filled with passionately physical imagery, this is Starnes’s quest for spiritual union with the Trinity.
Dr. Schmidt turned slowly towards her, responded in a polite tone that couldn’t hide his irritation. I talk with your coach, said Rex is best epee fencer I see, ten years. Can win state, has talent, but needs work, refinement. Coach agreed, said I teach him.
But I do believe God answers prayers. So, I'm asking for yours now. Please, please pray that those latest tests were because she had a UTI with no cause. That she had a full bladder because she didn't want to pee because it hurt. That the test won't show something major that causes us to have to put her through more stuff...or do another muscle biopsy.
Now we officially have three hives. Exciting!
Introverts cannot “fix themselves” and deserve respect for their natural temperament and contributions to the human race. In fact, one study (Silverman, 1986) showed that the percentage of Introverts increases with IQ.
As you see I think yes it does create a sense of place and the last line is great. I think all it needs is some sharpening to aid the flow. Removing superfluous words. See how this has been achieved so the meaning is clear and always visual. I also suggested how moving, as in he got down or she went … can be shown further still so the movement or action creates a better sense of the person. This is not essential but it helps.
This is what Wendy Thomas-- (as heard on NH public Radio and seen on WMUR Channel 9, Wendy has also been a guest on the Chicken Whisperer’s radio show and has been featured in Parenting NH, Backyard Poultry, Woman’s Day, and Reader’s Digest for her chicken stories and adventures in thrift) wrote to me:
1 entailed
This is the type of reward we really want; praise from the praiseworthy. We want God’s approval. We want our heavenly Father to tell us we’ve done well. We really want is to hear ‘Well done good and faithful servant’ when we stand before Him at the time of judgement.
At Elder-led prayer at church that night, we sang the words, "Lord you are faithful." By the third time, I whispered to Jesus, "I still feel so weak." As the music played, tears rolled down my checks and he whispered back, "I like you that way."
The outer layers are paper pierced and randomly stitched using embroidery thread.
best wishes on this sunday night.
Over the weekend, I went to Las Vegas with some friends by car. Without stops, the drive would have been nine hours or ten, with traffic. But we took quite a few stops for gas, food, bathroom, coffee, etc. Along the way, I took many pictures of the scenery we passed by. It was different from what I was accustomed to in the past: dry, mountainous desert land.
as the storm rolled through town.
Let’s imagine for a moment a board meeting at the Microsoft Corporation. I wonder who would be there? I don’t know exactly, but I’d bet at least 83% in attendance would most likely be corporate government representatives! The Defense Department would surely be there, for national security reasons of course. CIA? Probably, since they use the Internet to catch criminals and since they have so much power now to spy on us thanks to bills like The Patriot Act. How about Homeland Security? The military, and all of its branches? Raytheon, and other weapons contractors would probably be there too. I wonder who would represent the Federal Government? How about the Federal Reserve (a non-government agency) and the IRS (the Federal Reserves non-governmental private police and collection force for the central banks)? Heck, even Bill Gates would be there, but he would probably only have about as much power as the President of the United States has over his corporation, which is thankfully still called America. Yes, in case you were wondering, the United States is a corporation. Look it up! (http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lVsMUpPgdT0) (http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=klwWcp9eiPw&feature=related)
FOR BOB GOTTLIEB, a great editor and a long-suffering friend.
I was driving at the Fort yesterday afternoon along 26th Street heading for C5 south bound. At the stoplight where you can make a left to Market! Market! there’s a strip of orange traffic cones preventing the outer lane from making a left. As I drove through the intersection I realized two things. One is how the people of Fort Bonifacio Development Corporation (FBDC) have responded to the traffic caused by drivers wanting to turn left from the outer lane. The other is to see the line of orange cones as a temporary solution for undisciplined drivers. Drivers who don’t like traffic want to make a left on the next green light so they occupy the outer lane causing even more traffic. Those orange cones may get the job done but in the progressive Bonifacio Global City, they’re an eyesore.
Source: eBay Sellers Grading: Vinyl: VG minus. Cover VG
In times of chaos
There are loads of salon brand hair powders and dry shampoos, and they're about all the same. My favorite, however, has been around for
And, although this post is about metaphor cliches, there are all kinds of other cliches--word choices we don't even think of the meaning of. Many of them are peppered throughout this post, but since I was focusing on metaphor cliches, I'm going to let them slide, just this once. :-)
My mom had her inadequacies, I needed someone that would fight the good fight for me. I was not more than 7yr or 9yr. I can recall the prayer..".Dear God, could Mary be my mother?" I felt a twinge in my heart almost like something to be afraid of but peaceful at the same time. "I know, see, even though some very bad things happened there have been some very good things come from it. She took care of Jesus well enough to be born and to die for our sins. My mom doesn't seem to know what to do to help me and I don't even know if she really knows what to do."
Brewery Location: Santa Rosa, CA
Love always, Sarah B
Some would say it’s another singing competition but I would say try to watch it first because they do have a different concept. My most favorite part is the Blind Audition which actually made me emotional while watching it.
So to my friend, Tracey Barrow, have an extra special 40th Birthday all the way from Afghanistan, be seeing you soon and as always, love ME. xxx
D Amused
Might have been easier to understand if she’d been wearing her teeth.
Not officially part of Occupy, employees at Los Angeles International Airport joined May Day demonstrations to protest the hiring of non-union workers. Ten were arrested for blocking an intersection near LAX, reports CBS LA.
Fifty Shades of Grey, Fifty Shades Darker and Fifty Shades Freed by E. L. James
Next time we'll try a new tactic and look at some Scrooges who are a bit more... animated. Let's just say.
(¹ Though – thankfully!!! – there are some “whitehats” out there, and people, including our government, are finally taking cybercrime (and cyberwar) seriously.. what I mean is there really has been no law enforcement, and what laws have been passed have been toothless. IMHO. )
This event is louder, more raucous, more masculine than it was five years ago, last time I was here. There are fewer women here than there used to be. The vast hall is a constant roar. I think there might be a link between extreme hops and elevated testosterone.
A, You’re Adorable, Perry Como
Trading forums are great, especially for the purpose of picking up cards from newer sets. As I've already speculated, people that bust five boxes of Bowman aren't looking for base cards of Torii Hunter or Clay Buchholz, which makes Bowman an especially easy set to trade for.
Verbally Based Mnemonics: Many mnemonic devices are verbal and involve short poems, acronyms (a word or phrase with the first letter of things we are remembering) or songs to remember lists of related things:
(16) Micah 5:8-9
It seemed like everyone was trying to write picture books (this was before the current YA craze), so I figured it would be easier to break in with something different, like nonfiction. My local children’s librarian told me there was a need for biographies of women, and my mother, a music historian, suggested Clara Schumann. At first I said, “Oh, Mom, that’s your thing!” Then I thought about it and realized it was a good idea. I worked on a biography of Clara for about three years before selling it. That became my first book, Clara Schumann: Piano Virtuoso.
A refund can be delayed for a variety of reasons. For example submitting invalid records or applying after the deadline. To access the form for your tax refund, please
1950s. Some of her most memorable films at MGM include “Million Dollar Mermaid” and “Dangerous When Wet”.
Friday morning I said goodbye to Rich and headed over to Kittee's to work on the game show. Can I just say how much I heart that woman? She is amazing. We spent a little while prepping, then headed out to Native Bowl. Erika and Jordan showed up, and we chatted while waiting for Amey. I also met Luciana, Lisa, and Gabrielle. When Amey finally arrived, five of us piled into Kittee's car and headed back to her house. Amey, Kittee, and I pretty much worked on the game show and got the prizes together before registration.
Sharing the joy of the simple things of life together, would last forever
The victims also allege they had unsuccessfully tried to open cases at the local police station.
The obscure bastards in Kukl were of course as far removed from pop music as possible, even though they had performed some melodic songs in their earliest period. In the spring of 1986, the band lay in ruins due to personal squabbles and inter-band friction. Smaller units from the band tried their hand at making music. Guitarist God Krist made some music with Björk singing lyrics by Þór Eldon, Björk's boyfriend since 1983. They called themselves The Elgar Sisters, and three of the songs would much later turn up as B-sides on Björk singles. Björk and drummer Sigtryggur Baldursson also made some music together under the name Algorythms. Björk and Þór bore a son in June of 1986, so life was taken easy during that summer. Einar Örn finished his studies in London and moved to Iceland. During long night time meetings, him and Þór came up with the idea of forming Smekkleysa (“Bad Taste”). “Bad taste and extravagance” would be Smekkleysa's motto. Various plans were attached to Smekkleysa: It would be a record label and a book publishing company. The restaurant Mudpit would open in its name, as well as the radio station Radio Devil (unfortunately neither happened). Also the company would hand out "Bad Taste awards" to people that excelled in extravagance and bad taste. Various friends joined Smekkleysa and a pop group was formed solely to make money. Björk, Einar and Þór got bassist Bragi and guitarist Friðrik from Purrkur Pillnikk to join along with drummer Sigtryggur and keyboard player Einar Melax from Kukl.
Raid Steve Hilton’s old desk for something blue sky, something headline grabbing. Steve taken it all for his California dreaming?
Burridge line-up: 4-4-2 - GK: Ryan Jones, LB: Marc Judd, CB: Sam Hewitt (Mark Sanderson), CB: Ryan Hurst, RB: Mark Reeves, LM: Chris Pye, CM: Martyn Barnett (captain), CM: Kristian Hewitt, RM: Dan Jackson (Dan Allen), CF: Ben Rowe, CF: Sam Schwodler.
Last night I watched a program where they showed a diner located in one of the States, their specialty was Falafel. The host, who was a Chef too, tried to get the secret ingredients from those Falafel guys but couldn't.
The Nurse Practitioner’s Role
I made these cookies to bring to a get-together on Sunday with a bunch of friends with kids to wish my dear friend C good luck for her labor induction (she ended up giving birth to a healthy baby girl Tuesday at dawn).
"The Interrupted Wireless"
★ Insert Blank Pages
Rather than do it a great disservice and try to simplify the former into words, I won’t. But I will say that “Tin Shed Tales” was an absolute joy to watch. It was amazing to see an extremely gifted musician bare his soul and reveal a lot about himself and his craft. He shared so much that it had felt like a quiet, one-on-one situation in your own lounge room. In short, we learnt, laughed and even cried and the journey was worth every minute.
Is Cairnhill the site of the ‘Woolf-hole-craig’ preaching?
How To Win Friends And Influence People- Dale Carnegie
Sorry, it has been the main core in the computers of copper oxide psychiatry for decades.
I have no idea what it all means, and I continue to be suspicious of it. My eye is still twitching. Now if you’ll excuse me, I’m off to the Amish compound to have my abacus polished.
She said: "By not banning smoking in public places, the Government is putting the health of vast numbers of the population at risk and is also placing a huge burden on the NHS."And ...
(e) The Abusive Father, Mothers or Authority Figures : (Causing Harm) Ps 27:6-10.
In September 2010, I wrote a fairly lengthy piece about the impending Bus Rapid Transit system (BRT), which you can read here: http://accradailyphoto.blogspot.com/2010/09/ghanas-experimentation-with-bus-rapid.html.
